Intelligence machines Artificial intelligence  broadest sense intelligence exhibited machines particularly computer systems.  field research computer science develops studies methods software enable machines perceive environment uses learning intelligence take actions maximize chances achieving defined goals. Such machines may called AIs.  technology widely used throughout industry government science. Some high profile applications include advanced web search engines e. g. Google Search recommendation systems used YouTube Amazon Netflix interacting via human speech e. g. Google Assistant Siri Alexa autonomous vehicles e. g. Waymo generative creative tools e. g. ChatGPT  art superhuman play analysis strategy games e. g. chess . However many  applications perceived  A lot cutting edge  filtered general applications often without called  something becomes useful enough common enough labeled  anymore. three four Alan Turing first person conduct substantial research field called machine intelligence. five Artificial intelligence founded academic discipline 1956. six The field went multiple cycles optimism seven eight followed periods disappointment loss funding known  winter. nine ten Funding interest vastly increased two thousand twelve deep learning surpassed previous  techniques eleven two thousand seventeen transformer architecture. This led  boom early 2020s companies universities laboratories overwhelmingly based United States pioneering significant advances artificial intelligence. The growing use artificial intelligence 21st century influencing societal economic shift towards increased automation data driven decision making integration  systems various economic sectors areas life impacting job markets healthcare government industry education propaganda disinformation. This raises questions long term effects ethical implications risks  prompting discussions regulatory policies ensure safety benefits technology. The various subfields  research centered around particular goals use particular tools. The traditional goals  research include reasoning knowledge representation planning learning natural language processing perception support robotics. General intelligence ability complete task performable human least equal levelis among field long term goals. fourteen  reach goals  researchers adapted integrated wide range techniques including search mathematical optimization formal logic artificial neural networks methods based statistics operations research economics. b  also draws upon psychology linguistics philosophy neuroscience fields. fifteen Goals The general problem simulating creating intelligence broken subproblems. These consist particular traits capabilities researchers expect intelligent system display. The traits described received attention cover scope  research. Reasoning problem solving Early researchers developed algorithms imitated step step reasoning humans use solve puzzles make logical deductions. sixteen  late 1980s 1990s methods developed dealing uncertain incomplete information employing concepts probability economics. seventeen Many algorithms insufficient solving large reasoning problems experience combinatorial explosion They become exponentially slower problems grow. eighteen Even humans rarely use step step deduction early  research could model. They solve problems using fast intuitive judgments. nineteen Accurate efficient reasoning unsolved problem. Knowledge representation Knowledge representation knowledge engineering twenty allow  programs answer questions intelligently make deductions real world facts. Formal knowledge representations used content based indexing retrieval scene interpretation clinical decision support knowledge discovery mining interesting actionable inferences large databases areas. A knowledge base body knowledge represented form used program.  ontology set objects relations concepts properties used particular domain knowledge. Knowledge bases need represent things objects properties categories relations objects twentyseven situations events states time twentyeight causes effects twentynine knowledge knowledge know people know thirty default reasoning things humans assume true told differently remain true even facts changing thirtyone many aspects domains knowledge. Among difficult problems knowledge representation breadth commonsense knowledge set atomic facts average person knows enormous thirtytwo sub symbolic form commonsense knowledge much people know represented facts statements could express verbally. nineteen There also difficulty knowledge acquisition problem obtaining knowledge  applications. c Planning decision making  agent anything perceives takes actions world. A rational agent goals preferences takes actions make happen.  automated planning agent specific goal. thirtysix  automated decision making agent preferencesthere situations would prefer situations trying avoid. The decision making agent assigns number situation called utility measures much agent prefers. For possible action calculate expected utility utility possible outcomes action weighted probability outcome occur.  choose action maximum expected utility. thirtyseven  classical planning agent knows exactly effect action. thirtyeight  real world problems however agent may certain situation unknown unobservable may know certain happen possible action deterministic.  must choose action making probabilistic guess reassess situation see action worked. thirtynine  problems agent preferences may uncertain especially agents humans involved. These learned e. g. inverse reinforcement learning agent seek information improve preferences. forty Information value theory used weigh value exploratory experimental actions. fortyone The space possible future actions situations typically intractably large agents must take actions evaluate situations uncertain outcome. A Markov decision process transition model describes probability particular action change state particular way reward function supplies utility state cost action. A policy associates decision possible state. The policy could calculated e. g. iteration heuristic learned. fortytwo Game theory describes rational behavior multiple interacting agents used  programs make decisions involve agents. fortythree Learning Machine learning study programs improve performance given task automatically. fortyfour  part  beginning. e There several kinds machine learning. Unsupervised learning analyzes stream data finds patterns makes predictions without guidance. fortyseven Supervised learning requires human label input data first comes two main varieties classification program must learn predict category input belongs regression program must deduce numeric function based numeric input. fortyeight  reinforcement learning agent rewarded good responses punished bad ones. The agent learns choose responses classified good. fortynine Transfer learning knowledge gained one problem applied new problem. fifty Deep learning type machine learning runs inputs biologically inspired artificial neural networks types learning. fiftyone Computational learning theory assess learners computational complexity sample complexity much data required notions optimization. fiftytwo Natural language processing Natural language processing NLP fiftythree allows programs read write communicate human languages English. Specific problems include speech recognition speech synthesis machine translation information extraction information retrieval question answering. fiftyfour Early work based Noam Chomsky generative grammar semantic networks difficulty word sense disambiguation f unless restricted small domains called micro worlds due common sense knowledge problem thirtytwo. Margaret Masterman believed meaning grammar key understanding languages thesauri dictionaries basis computational language structure. Modern deep learning techniques NLP include word embedding representing words typically vectors encoding meaning transformers deep learning architecture using attention mechanism others. fiftyseven  two thousand nineteen generative pre trained transformer GPT language models began generate coherent text two thousand twentythree models able get human level scores bar exam SAT test GRE test many real world applications. Perception Machine perception ability use input sensors cameras microphones wireless signals active lidar sonar radar tactile sensors deduce aspects world. Computer vision ability analyze visual input. sixtyone The field includes speech recognition image classification facial recognition object recognition object tracking sixtyfive robotic perception. Social intelligence Affective computing interdisciplinary umbrella comprises systems recognize interpret process simulate human feeling emotion mood. sixtyeight For example virtual assistants programmed speak conversationally even banter humorously makes appear sensitive emotional dynamics human interaction otherwise facilitate humancomputer interaction. However tends give naive users unrealistic conception intelligence existing computer agents. Moderate successes related affective computing include textual sentiment analysis recently multimodal sentiment analysis wherein  classifies affects displayed videotaped subject. General intelligence A machine artificial general intelligence able solve wide variety problems breadth versatility similar human intelligence. fourteen Techniques  research uses wide variety techniques accomplish goals. b Search optimization  solve many problems intelligently searching many possible solutions. seventyone There two different kinds search used  state space search local search. State space search State space search searches tree possible states try find goal state. seventytwo For example planning algorithms search trees goals subgoals attempting find path target goal process called means ends analysis. Simple exhaustive searches seventyfour rarely sufficient real world problems search space number places search quickly grows astronomical numbers. The result search slow never completes. eighteen Heuristics rules thumb help prioritize choices likely reach goal. seventyfive Adversarial search used game playing programs chess .  searches tree possible moves counter moves looking winning position. seventysix Local search Local search uses mathematical optimization find solution problem.  begins form guess refines incrementally. seventyseven Gradient descent type local search optimizes set numerical parameters incrementally adjusting minimize loss function. Variants gradient descent commonly used train neural networks. seventyeight Another type local search evolutionary computation aims iteratively improve set candidate solutions mutating recombining selecting fittest survive generation. seventynine Distributed search processes coordinate via swarm intelligence algorithms. Two popular swarm algorithms used search particle swarm optimization inspired bird flocking ant colony optimization inspired ant trails. Logic Formal logic used reasoning knowledge representation. eightyone Formal logic comes two main forms propositional logic operates statements true false uses logical connectives implies eightytwo predicate logic also operates objects predicates relations uses quantifiers Every X Y There X Y. eightythree Deductive reasoning logic process proving new statement conclusion statements given assumed true premises. eightyfour Proofs structured proof trees nodes labelled sentences children nodes connected parent nodes inference rules. Given problem set premises problem solving reduces searching proof tree whose root node labelled solution problem whose leaf nodes labelled premises axioms.  case Horn clauses problem solving search performed reasoning forwards premises backwards problem. eightyfive  general case clausal form first order logic resolution single axiom free rule inference problem solved proving contradiction premises include negation problem solved. eightysix Inference Horn clause logic first order logic undecidable therefore intractable. However backward reasoning Horn clauses underpins computation logic programming language Prolog Turing complete. Moreover efficiency competitive computation symbolic programming languages. eightyseven Fuzzy logic assigns degree truth zero .  therefore handle propositions vague partially true. eightyeight Non monotonic logics including logic programming negation failure designed handle default reasoning. thirtyone Other specialized versions logic developed describe many complex domains. Probabilistic methods uncertain reasoning Many problems  including reasoning planning learning perception robotics require agent operate incomplete uncertain information.  researchers devised number tools solve problems using methods probability theory economics. eightynine Precise mathematical tools developed analyze agent make choices plan using decision theory decision analysis ninety information value theory. ninetyone These tools include models Markov decision processes ninetytwo dynamic decision networks ninetythree game theory mechanism design. ninetyfour Bayesian networks ninetyfive tool used reasoning using Bayesian inference algorithm g ninetyseven learning using expectationmaximization algorithm h ninetynine planning using decision networks one hundred perception using dynamic Bayesian networks. ninetythree Probabilistic algorithms also used filtering prediction smoothing finding explanations streams data thus helping perception systems analyze processes occur time e. g. hidden Markov models Kalman filters. ninetythree Classifiers statistical learning methods The simplest  applications divided two types classifiers e. g. shiny diamond one hand controllers e. g. diamond pick hand. Classifiers one hundred one functions use pattern matching determine closest match. They fine tuned based chosen examples using supervised learning. Each pattern also called observation labeled certain predefined class. All observations combined class labels known data set. When new observation received observation classified based previous experience. fortyeight There many kinds classifiers use. The decision tree simplest widely used symbolic machine learning algorithm. one hundred two K nearest neighbor algorithm widely used analogical  mid 1990s Kernel methods support vector machine SVM displaced k nearest neighbor 1990s. one hundred three The naive Bayes classifier reportedly widely used learner Google due part scalability. one hundred five Neural networks also used classifiers. one hundred six Artificial neural networks  artificial neural network based collection nodes also known artificial neurons loosely model neurons biological brain.  trained recognise patterns trained recognise patterns fresh data. There input least one hidden layer nodes output. Each node applies function weight crosses specified threshold data transmitted next layer. A network typically called deep neural network least two hidden layers. one hundred six Learning algorithms neural networks use local search choose weights get right output input training. The common training technique backpropagation algorithm. one hundred seven Neural networks learn model complex relationships inputs outputs find patterns data.  theory neural network learn function. one hundred eight  feedforward neural networks signal passes one direction. one hundred nine Recurrent neural networks feed output signal back input allows short term memories previous input events. Long short term memory successful network architecture recurrent networks. one hundred ten Perceptrons one hundred eleven use single layer neurons deep learning one hundred twelve uses multiple layers. Convolutional neural networks strengthen connection neurons close otherthis especially important image processing local set neurons must identify edge network identify object. one hundred thirteen Deep learning Deep learning one hundred twelve uses several layers neurons network inputs outputs. The multiple layers progressively extract higher level features raw input. For example image processing lower layers may identify edges higher layers may identify concepts relevant human digits letters faces. Deep learning profoundly improved performance programs many important subfields artificial intelligence including computer vision speech recognition natural language processing image classification others. The reason deep learning performs well many applications known 2023. The sudden success deep learning twenty million one hundred twentytwo thousand fifteen occur new discovery theoretical breakthrough deep neural networks backpropagation described many people far back 1950s two factors incredible increase computer power including hundred fold increase speed switching GPUs availability vast amounts training data especially giant curated datasets used benchmark testing ImageNet. j GPT Generative pre trained transformers GPT large language models based semantic relationships words sentences natural language processing. Text based GPT models pre trained large corpus text internet. The pre training consists predicting next token token usually word subword punctuation. Throughout pre training GPT models accumulate knowledge world generate human like text repeatedly predicting next token. Typically subsequent training phase makes model truthful useful harmless usually technique called reinforcement learning human feedback RLHF. Current GPT models still prone generating falsehoods called hallucinations although reduced RLHF quality data. They used chatbots allow ask question request task simple text. one hundred twentysix Current models services include Gemini formerly Bard ChatGPT Grok Claude Copilot LLaMA. one hundred twentyseven Multimodal GPT models process different types data modalities images videos sound text. Specialized hardware software  late 2010s graphics processing units GPUs increasingly designed  specific enhancements used specialized TensorFlow software replaced previously used central processing unit CPUs dominant means large scale commercial academic machine learning models training. Specialized programming languages Prolog used early  research one hundred thirty general purpose programming languages like Python become predominant. one hundred thirtyone Applications  machine learning technology used essential applications 2020s including search engines Google Search targeting online advertisements recommendation systems offered Netflix YouTube Amazon driving internet traffic targeted advertising AdSense Facebook virtual assistants Siri Alexa autonomous vehicles including drones ADAS self driving cars automatic language translation Microsoft Translator Google Translate facial recognition Apple Face  Microsoft DeepFace Google FaceNet image labeling used Facebook Apple iPhoto TikTok. Health medicine The application  medicine medical research potential increase patient care quality life. one hundred thirtytwo Through lens Hippocratic Oath medical professionals ethically compelled use  applications accurately diagnose treat patients. For medical research  important tool processing integrating big data. This particularly important organoid tissue engineering development use microscopy imaging key technique fabrication. one hundred thirtythree  suggested  overcome discrepancies funding allocated different fields research. one hundred thirtythree New  tools deepen understanding biomedically relevant pathways. For example AlphaFold two two thousand twentyone demonstrated ability approximate hours rather months  structure protein. one hundred thirtyfour  two thousand twentythree reported  guided drug discovery helped find class antibiotics capable killing two different types drug resistant bacteria. one hundred thirtyfive  two thousand twentyfour researchers used machine learning accelerate search Parkinson disease drug treatments. Their aim identify compounds block clumping aggregation alpha synuclein protein characterises Parkinson disease. They able speed initial screening process ten fold reduce cost thousand fold. one hundred thirtysix one hundred thirtyseven Games Game playing programs used since 1950s demonstrate test  advanced techniques. one hundred thirtyeight Deep Blue became first computer chess playing system beat reigning world chess champion Garry Kasparov eleven May 1997. one hundred thirtynine  two thousand eleven Jeopardy quiz show exhibition match IBM question answering system Watson defeated two greatest Jeopardy champions Brad Rutter Ken Jennings significant margin. one hundred forty  March two thousand sixteen AlphaGo four five games  match  champion Lee Sedol becoming first computer  playing system beat professional  player without handicaps. Then two thousand seventeen defeated  Jie best  player world. one hundred fortyone Other programs handle imperfect information games poker playing program Pluribus. one hundred fortytwo DeepMind developed increasingly generalistic reinforcement learning models MuZero could trained play chess  Atari games. one hundred fortythree  two thousand nineteen DeepMind AlphaStar achieved grandmaster level StarCraft  particularly challenging real time strategy game involves incomplete knowledge happens map. one hundred fortyfour  two thousand twentyone  agent competed PlayStation Gran Turismo competition winning four world best Gran Turismo drivers using deep reinforcement learning. one hundred fortyfive Finance Finance one fastest growing sectors applied  tools deployed retail online banking investment advice insurance automated robot advisers use years. one hundred fortysix World Pensions experts like Nicolas Firzli insist may early see emergence highly innovative  informed financial products services deployment  tools simply automatise things destroying tens thousands jobs banking financial planning pension advice process I  sure unleash new wave e. g. sophisticated pension innovation. one hundred fortyseven Military Various countries deploying  military applications. one hundred fortyeight The main applications enhance command control communications sensors integration interoperability. one hundred fortynine Research targeting intelligence collection analysis logistics cyber operations information operations semiautonomous autonomous vehicles. one hundred fortyeight  technologies enable coordination sensors effectors threat detection identification marking enemy positions target acquisition coordination deconfliction distributed Joint Fires networked combat vehicles involving manned unmanned teams. one hundred fortynine  incorporated military operations Iraq Syria. one hundred fortyeight  November two thousand twentythree  Vice President Kamala Harris disclosed declaration signed thirtyone nations set guardrails military use . The commitments include using legal reviews ensure compliance military  international laws cautious transparent development technology. one hundred fifty Generative   early 2020s generative  gained widespread prominence.  March two thousand twentythree fiftyeight YOU. S. adults heard ChatGPT fourteen tried. one hundred fiftyone The increasing realism ease use  based text image generators Midjourney DALL E Stable Diffusion sparked trend viral  generated photos. Widespread attention gained fake photo Pope Francis wearing white puffer coat fictional arrest Donald Trump hoax attack Pentagon well usage professional creative arts. one hundred fiftytwo one hundred fiftythree Other industry specific tasks There also thousands successful  applications used solve specific problems specific industries institutions.  two thousand seventeen survey one five companies reported incorporated  offerings processes. one hundred fiftyfour A examples energy storage medical diagnosis military logistics applications predict result judicial decisions foreign policy supply chain management.  agriculture  helped farmers identify areas need irrigation fertilization pesticide treatments increasing yield. Agronomists use  conduct research development.  used predict ripening time crops tomatoes monitor soil moisture operate agricultural robots conduct predictive analytics classify livestock pig call emotions automate greenhouses detect diseases pests save water. Artificial intelligence used astronomy analyze increasing amounts available data applications mainly classification regression clustering forecasting generation discovery development new scientific insights example discovering exoplanets forecasting solar activity distinguishing signals instrumental effects gravitational wave astronomy.  could also used activities space space exploration including analysis data space missions real time science decisions spacecraft space debris avoidance autonomous operation. Ethics  potential benefits potential risks.  may able advance science find solutions serious problems Demis Hassabis Deep Mind hopes solve intelligence use solve everything else. However use  become widespread several unintended consequences risks identified.  production systems sometimes factor ethics bias  training processes especially  algorithms inherently unexplainable deep learning. Risks harm Privacy copyright Machine learning algorithms require large amounts data. The techniques used acquire data raised concerns privacy surveillance copyright. Technology companies collect wide range data users including online activity geolocation data video audio. For example order build speech recognition algorithms Amazon recorded millions private conversations allowed temporary workers listen transcribe. Opinions widespread surveillance range see necessary evil clearly unethical violation right privacy.  developers argue way deliver valuable applications. developed several techniques attempt preserve privacy still obtaining data data aggregation de identification differential privacy. Since two thousand sixteen privacy experts Cynthia Dwork begun view privacy terms fairness. Brian Christian wrote experts pivoted question know question. Generative  often trained unlicensed copyrighted works including domains images computer code output used rationale fair use. Experts disagree well circumstances rationale hold courts law relevant factors may include purpose character use copyrighted work effect upon potential market copyrighted work. one hundred sixtyfour Website owners wish content scraped indicate robots. txt file. one hundred sixtyfive  two thousand twentythree leading authors including John Grisham Jonathan Franzen sued  companies using work train generative . Another discussed approach envision separate sui generis system protection creations generated  ensure fair attribution compensation human authors. one hundred sixtyeight Misinformation YouTube Facebook others use recommender systems guide users content. These  programs given goal maximizing user engagement goal keep people watching. The  learned users tended choose misinformation conspiracy theories extreme partisan content keep watching  recommended. Users also tended watch content subject  led people filter bubbles received multiple versions misinformation. This convinced many users misinformation true ultimately undermined trust institutions media government. one hundred seventy The  program correctly learned maximize goal result harmful society. After YOU. S. election two thousand sixteen major technology companies took steps mitigate problem.  two thousand twentytwo generative  began create images audio video text indistinguishable real photographs recordings films human writing.  possible bad actors use technology create massive amounts misinformation propaganda.  pioneer Geoffrey Hinton expressed concern  enabling authoritarian leaders manipulate electorates large scale among risks. Algorithmic bias fairness Machine learning applications biased learn biased data. The developers may aware bias exists. Bias introduced way training data selected way model deployed.  biased algorithm used make decisions seriously harm people medicine finance recruitment housing policing algorithm may cause discrimination. one hundred seventysix Fairness machine learning study prevent harm caused algorithmic bias.  become serious area academic study within . Researchers discovered always possible define fairness way satisfies stakeholders. one hundred seventyseven  June twentyeight two thousand fifteen Google Photos new image labeling feature mistakenly identified Jacky Alcine friend gorillas black. The system trained dataset contained images black people problem called sample size disparity. Google fixed problem preventing system labelling anything gorilla. Eight years later two thousand twentythree Google Photos still could identify gorilla neither could similar products Apple Facebook Microsoft Amazon. COMPAS commercial program widely used YOU. S. courts assess likelihood defendant becoming recidivist.  two thousand sixteen Julia Angwin ProPublica discovered COMPAS exhibited racial bias despite fact program told races defendants. Although error rate whites blacks calibrated equal exactly sixtyone errors race differentthe system consistently overestimated chance black person would offend would underestimate chance white person would offend.  two thousand seventeen several researchers k showed mathematically impossible COMPAS accommodate possible measures fairness base rates offense different whites blacks data. one hundred eightythree A program make biased decisions even data explicitly mention problematic feature race gender. The feature correlate features like address shopping history first name program make decisions based features would race gender. one hundred eightyfour Moritz Hardt said robust fact research area fairness blindness work. one hundred eightyfive Criticism COMPAS highlighted machine learning models designed make predictions valid assume future resemble past.  trained data includes results racist decisions past machine learning models must predict racist decisions made future.  application uses predictions recommendations recommendations likely racist. one hundred eightysix Thus machine learning well suited help make decisions areas hope future better past.  descriptive rather prescriptive. l Bias unfairness may go undetected developers overwhelmingly white male among  engineers four black twenty women.  two thousand twentytwo Conference Fairness Accountability Transparency ACM FAccT two thousand twentytwo Association Computing Machinery Seoul South Korea presented published findings recommend  robotics systems demonstrated free bias mistakes unsafe use self learning neural networks trained vast unregulated sources flawed internet data curtailed. Lack transparency Many  systems complex designers explain reach decisions. Particularly deep neural networks large amount non linear relationships inputs outputs. But popular explainability techniques exist. one hundred ninety  impossible certain program operating correctly one knows exactly works. There many cases machine learning program passed rigorous tests nevertheless learned something different programmers intended. For example system could identify skin diseases better medical professionals found actually strong tendency classify images ruler cancerous pictures malignancies typically include ruler show scale. Another machine learning system designed help effectively allocate medical resources found classify patients asthma low risk dying pneumonia. Having asthma actually severe risk factor since patients asthma would usually get much medical care relatively unlikely die according training data. The correlation asthma low risk dying pneumonia real misleading. People harmed algorithm decision right explanation. one hundred ninetythree Doctors example expected clearly completely explain colleagues reasoning behind decision make. Early drafts European Union General Data Protection Regulation two thousand sixteen included explicit statement right exists. Industry experts noted unsolved problem solution sight. Regulators argued nevertheless harm real problem solution tools used. DARPA established XAI Explainable Artificial Intelligence program two thousand fourteen try solve problems. There several possible solutions transparency problem. SHAP tried solve transparency problems visualising contribution feature output. LIME locally approximate model simpler interpretable model. Multitask learning provides large number outputs addition target classification. These outputs help developers deduce network learned. Deconvolution DeepDream generative methods allow developers see different layers deep network learned produce output suggest network learning. Bad actors weaponized  Artificial intelligence provides number tools useful bad actors authoritarian governments terrorists criminals rogue states. A lethal autonomous weapon machine locates selects engages human targets without human supervision. n Widely available  tools used bad actors develop inexpensive autonomous weapons produced scale potentially weapons mass destruction. Even used conventional warfare unlikely unable reliably choose targets could potentially kill innocent person.  two thousand fourteen thirty nations including China supported ban autonomous weapons United Nations Convention Certain Conventional Weapons however United States others disagreed.  two thousand fifteen fifty countries reported researching battlefield robots. two hundred three  tools make easier authoritarian governments efficiently control citizens several ways. Face voice recognition allow widespread surveillance. Machine learning operating data classify potential enemies state prevent hiding. Recommendation systems precisely target propaganda misinformation maximum effect. Deepfakes generative  aid producing misinformation. Advanced  make authoritarian centralized decision making competitive liberal decentralized systems markets.  lowers cost difficulty digital warfare advanced spyware. All technologies available since two thousand twenty earlierAI facial recognition systems already used mass surveillance China. two hundred five two hundred six There many ways  expected help bad actors foreseen. For example machine learning  able design tens thousands toxic molecules matter hours. Reliance industry giants Training  systems requires enormous amount computing power. Usually Big Tech companies financial resources make investments. Smaller startups Cohere OpenAI end buying access data centers Google Microsoft respectively. two hundred eight Technological unemployment Economists frequently highlighted risks redundancies  speculated unemployment adequate social policy full employment. two hundred nine  past technology tended increase rather reduce total employment economists acknowledge uncharted territory . two hundred ten A survey economists showed disagreement whether increasing use robots  cause substantial increase long term unemployment generally agree could net benefit productivity gains redistributed. Risk estimates vary example 2010s Michael Osborne Carl Benedikt Frey estimated fortyseven YOU. S. jobs high risk potential automation OECD report classified nine YOU. S. jobs high risk. two hundred thirteen The methodology speculating future employment levels criticised lacking evidential foundation implying technology rather social policy creates unemployment opposed redundancies. two hundred nine  April two thousand twentythree reported seventy jobs Chinese video game illustrators eliminated generative artificial intelligence. two hundred fourteen two hundred fifteen Unlike previous waves automation many middle class jobs may eliminated artificial intelligence The Economist stated two thousand fifteen worry  could white collar jobs steam power blue collar ones Industrial Revolution worth taking seriously. Jobs extreme risk range paralegals fast food cooks job demand likely increase care related professions ranging personal healthcare clergy. two hundred seventeen From early days development artificial intelligence arguments example put forward Joseph Weizenbaum whether tasks done computers actually done given difference computers humans quantitative calculation qualitative value based judgement. two hundred eighteen Existential risk  argued  become powerful humanity may irreversibly lose control. This could physicist Stephen Hawking stated spell end human race. This scenario common science fiction computer robot suddenly develops human like self awareness sentience consciousness becomes malevolent character. p These sci fi scenarios misleading several ways. First  require human like sentience existential risk. Modern  programs given specific goals use learning intelligence achieve. Philosopher Nick Bostrom argued one gives almost goal sufficiently powerful  may choose destroy humanity achieve used example paperclip factory manager. Stuart Russell gives example household robot tries find way kill owner prevent unplugged reasoning fetch coffee dead.  order safe humanity superintelligence would genuinely aligned humanity morality values fundamentally side. two hundred twentythree Second Yuval Noah Harari argues  require robot body physical control pose existential risk. The essential parts civilization physical. Things like ideologies law government money economy made language exist stories billions people believe. The current prevalence misinformation suggests  could use language convince people believe anything even take actions destructive. The opinions amongst experts industry insiders mixed sizable fractions concerned unconcerned risk eventual superintelligent . Personalities Stephen Hawking Bill Gates Elon Musk two hundred twentysix well  pioneers like Geoffrey Hinton Yoshua Bengio Demis Hassabis Sam Altman expressed concerns existential risk .  two thousand twentythree many leading  experts issued joint statement Mitigating risk extinction  global priority alongside societal scale risks pandemics nuclear war. Other researchers however spoke favor less dystopian view.  pioneer Juergen Schmidhuber sign joint statement emphasising ninetyfive cases  research making human lives longer healthier easier. two hundred twentyeight While tools used improve lives also used bad actors also used bad actors. two hundred twentynine two hundred thirty Andrew  also argued mistake fall doomsday hype AIand regulators benefit vested interests. two hundred thirtyone Yann LeCun scoffs peers dystopian scenarios supercharged misinformation even eventually human extinction. two hundred thirtytwo  early 2010s experts argued risks distant future warrant research humans valuable perspective superintelligent machine. two hundred thirtythree However two thousand sixteen study current future risks possible solutions became serious area research. Ethical machines alignment Friendly  machines designed beginning minimize risks make choices benefit humans. Eliezer Yudkowsky coined term argues developing friendly  higher research priority may require large investment must completed  becomes existential risk. Machines intelligence potential use intelligence make ethical decisions. The field machine ethics provides machines ethical principles procedures resolving ethical dilemmas. two hundred thirtysix The field machine ethics also called computational morality two hundred thirtysix founded AAAI symposium 2005. Other approaches include Wendell Wallach artificial moral agents Stuart J. Russell three principles developing provably beneficial machines. Open source Active organizations  open source community include Hugging Face two hundred forty Google two hundred fortyone EleutherAI Meta. two hundred fortytwo Various  models Llama two Mistral Stable Diffusion made open weight two hundred fortythree two hundred fortyfour meaning architecture trained parameters weights publicly available. Open weight models freely fine tuned allows companies specialize data use case. two hundred fortyfive Open weight models useful research innovation also misused. Since fine tuned built security measure objecting harmful requests trained away becomes ineffective. Some researchers warn future  models may develop dangerous capabilities potential drastically facilitate bioterrorism released Internet deleted everywhere needed. They recommend pre release audits cost benefit analyses. two hundred fortysix Frameworks Artificial Intelligence projects ethical permissibility tested designing developing implementing  system.   framework Care Act Framework containing SUM valuesdeveloped Alan Turing Institute tests projects four main areas two hundred fortyseven two hundred fortyeight RESPECT dignity individual people CONNECT people sincerely openly inclusively CARE wellbeing everyone PROTECT social values justice public interest Other developments ethical frameworks include decided upon Asilomar Conference Montreal Declaration Responsible  IEEE Ethics Autonomous Systems initiative among others two hundred fortynine however principles go without criticisms especially regards people chosen contributes frameworks. two hundred fifty Promotion wellbeing people communities technologies affect requires consideration social ethical implications stages  system design development implementation collaboration job roles data scientists product managers data engineers domain experts delivery managers. two hundred fiftyone The  Safety Institute  released testing toolset called Inspect  safety evaluations available MIT open source licence freely available GitHub improved third party packages.  used evaluate  models range areas including core knowledge ability reason autonomous capabilities. two hundred fiftytwo Regulation The regulation artificial intelligence development public sector policies laws promoting regulating artificial intelligence  therefore related broader regulation algorithms. two hundred fiftythree The regulatory policy landscape  emerging issue jurisdictions globally. According  Index Stanford annual number  related laws passed one hundred twentyseven survey countries jumped one passed two thousand sixteen thirtyseven passed two thousand twentytwo alone. Between two thousand sixteen two thousand twenty thirty countries adopted dedicated strategies . Most  member states released national  strategies Canada China India Japan Mauritius Russian Federation Saudi Arabia United Arab Emirates YOU. S. Vietnam. Others process elaborating  strategy including Bangladesh Malaysia Tunisia. The Global Partnership Artificial Intelligence launched June two thousand twenty stating need  developed accordance human rights democratic values ensure public confidence trust technology. Henry Kissinger Eric Schmidt Daniel Huttenlocher published joint statement November two thousand twentyone calling government commission regulate .  two thousand twentythree OpenAI leaders published recommendations governance superintelligence believe may happen less ten years.  two thousand twentythree United Nations also launched advisory body provide recommendations  governance body comprises technology company executives governments officials academics. two hundred sixty  two thousand twentytwo Ipsos survey attitudes towards  varied greatly country seventyeight Chinese citizens thirtyfive Americans agreed products services using  benefits drawbacks. A two thousand twentythree Reuters Ipsos poll found sixtyone Americans agree twentytwo disagree  poses risks humanity.  two thousand twentythree Fox News poll thirtyfive Americans thought important additional fortyone thought somewhat important federal government regulate  versus thirteen responding important eight responding important.  November two thousand twentythree first global  Safety Summit held Bletchley Park  discuss near far term risks  possibility mandatory voluntary regulatory frameworks. two hundred sixtyfour twentyeight countries including United States China European Union issued declaration start summit calling international  operation manage challenges risks artificial intelligence. two hundred sixtyfive two hundred sixtysix  May two thousand twentyfour  Seoul Summit sixteen global  tech companies agreed safety commitments development . two hundred sixtyseven two hundred sixtyeight History The study mechanical formal reasoning began philosophers mathematicians antiquity. The study logic led directly Alan Turing theory computation suggested machine shuffling symbols simple zero one could simulate conceivable form mathematical reasoning. five This along concurrent discoveries cybernetics information theory neurobiology led researchers consider possibility building electronic brain. q They developed several areas research would become part  two hundred seventyone McCullouch Pitts design artificial neurons one thousand nine hundred fortythree Turing influential one thousand nine hundred fifty paper Computing Machinery Intelligence introduced Turing test showed machine intelligence plausible. two hundred seventythree five The field  research founded workshop Dartmouth College 1956. r six The attendees became leaders  research 1960s. They students produced programs press described astonishing computers learning checkers strategies solving word problems algebra proving logical theorems speaking English. seven Artificial intelligence laboratories set number British YOU. S. Universities latter 1950s early 1960s. five Researchers 1960s 1970s convinced methods would eventually succeed creating machine general intelligence considered goal field. Herbert Simon predicted machines capable within twenty years work man. two hundred seventyeight Marvin Minsky agreed writing within generation... problem creating artificial intelligence substantially solved. two hundred seventynine They however underestimated difficulty problem. v  one thousand nine hundred seventyfour YOU. S. British governments cut exploratory research response criticism Sir James Lighthill ongoing pressure YOU. S. Congress fund productive projects. Minsky Papert book Perceptrons understood proving artificial neural networks would never useful solving real world tasks thus discrediting approach altogether. The  winter period obtaining funding  projects difficult followed. nine  early 1980s  research revived commercial success expert systems two hundred eightyfour form  program simulated knowledge analytical skills human experts.  one thousand nine hundred eightyfive market  reached billion dollars.  time Japan fifth generation computer project inspired YOU. S. British governments restore funding academic research. eight However beginning collapse Lisp Machine market one thousand nine hundred eightyseven  fell disrepute second longer lasting winter began. ten  point  funding gone projects used high level symbols represent mental objects like plans goals beliefs known facts.  1980s researchers began doubt approach would able imitate processes human cognition especially perception robotics learning pattern recognition began look sub symbolic approaches. Rodney Brooks rejected representation general focussed directly engineering machines move survive. w Judea Pearl Lofti Zadeh others developed methods handled incomplete uncertain information making reasonable guesses rather precise logic. eightynine But important development revival connectionism including neural network research Geoffrey Hinton others. two hundred ninetytwo  one thousand nine hundred ninety Yann LeCun successfully showed convolutional neural networks recognize handwritten digits first many successful applications neural networks.  gradually restored reputation late 1990s early 21st century exploiting formal mathematical methods finding specific solutions specific problems. This narrow formal focus allowed researchers produce verifiable results collaborate fields statistics economics mathematics. two hundred ninetyfour  two thousand solutions developed  researchers widely used although 1990s rarely described artificial intelligence. two hundred ninetyfive However several academic researchers became concerned  longer pursuing original goal creating versatile fully intelligent machines. Beginning around two thousand two founded subfield artificial general intelligence AGI several well funded institutions 2010s. fourteen Deep learning began dominate industry benchmarks two thousand twelve adopted throughout field. eleven For many specific tasks methods abandoned. x Deep learning success based hardware improvements faster computers two hundred ninetyseven graphics processing units cloud computing access large amounts data two hundred ninetynine including curated datasets ImageNet. Deep learning success led enormous increase interest funding . The amount machine learning research measured total publications increased fifty years 20152019.  two thousand sixteen issues fairness misuse technology catapulted center stage machine learning conferences publications vastly increased funding became available many researchers focussed careers issues. The alignment problem became serious field academic study.  late teens early 2020s AGI companies began deliver programs created enormous interest.  two thousand fifteen AlphaGo developed DeepMind beat world champion  player. The program taught rules game developed strategy. GPT three large language model released two thousand twenty OpenAI capable generating high quality human like text. three hundred These programs others inspired aggressive  boom large companies began investing billions  research. According  Impacts fifty billion annually invested  around two thousand twentytwo YOU. S. alone twenty new YOU. S. Computer Science PhD graduates specialized . About eight hundred zero  related YOU. S. job openings existed 2022. Philosophy Defining artificial intelligence Alan Turing wrote one thousand nine hundred fifty I propose consider question machines think  advised changing question whether machine thinks whether possible machinery show intelligent behaviour.  devised Turing test measures ability machine simulate human conversation. two hundred seventythree Since observe behavior machine matter actually thinking literally mind. Turing notes determine things people usual polite convention everyone thinks Russell Norvig agree Turing intelligence must defined terms external behavior internal structure. However critical test requires machine imitate humans. Aeronautical engineering texts wrote define goal field making machines fly exactly like pigeons fool pigeons.  founder John McCarthy agreed writing Artificial intelligence definition simulation human intelligence. McCarthy defines intelligence computational part ability achieve goals world. Another  founder Marvin Minsky similarly describes ability solve hard problems. The leading  textbook defines study agents perceive environment take actions maximize chances achieving defined goals. These definitions view intelligence terms well defined problems well defined solutions difficulty problem performance program direct measures intelligence machineand philosophical discussion required may even possible. Another definition adopted Google three hundred nine major practitioner field . This definition stipulates ability systems synthesize information manifestation intelligence similar way defined biological intelligence. Evaluating approaches  No established unifying theory paradigm guided  research history. z The unprecedented success statistical machine learning 2010s eclipsed approaches much sources especially business world use term artificial intelligence mean machine learning neural networks. This approach mostly sub symbolic soft narrow. Critics argue questions may revisited future generations  researchers. Symbolic  limits Symbolic  GOFAI three hundred eleven simulated high level conscious reasoning people use solve puzzles express legal reasoning mathematics. They highly successful intelligent tasks algebra  tests.  1960s Newell Simon proposed physical symbol systems hypothesis A physical symbol system necessary sufficient means general intelligent action. three hundred twelve However symbolic approach failed many tasks humans solve easily learning recognizing object commonsense reasoning. Moravec paradox discovery high level intelligent tasks easy  low level instinctive tasks extremely difficult. three hundred thirteen Philosopher Hubert Dreyfus argued since 1960s human expertise depends unconscious instinct rather conscious symbol manipulation feel situation rather explicit symbolic knowledge. three hundred fourteen Although arguments ridiculed ignored first presented eventually  research came agree. aa nineteen The issue resolved sub symbolic reasoning make many inscrutable mistakes human intuition algorithmic bias. Critics Noam Chomsky argue continuing research symbolic  still necessary attain general intelligence part sub symbolic  move away explainable  difficult impossible understand modern statistical  program made particular decision. The emerging field neuro symbolic artificial intelligence attempts bridge two approaches. Neat . scruffy Neats hope intelligent behavior described using simple elegant principles logic optimization neural networks. Scruffies expect necessarily requires solving large number unrelated problems. Neats defend programs theoretical rigor scruffies rely mainly incremental testing see work. This issue actively discussed 1970s 1980s three hundred eighteen eventually seen irrelevant. Modern  elements. Soft . hard computing Finding provably correct optimal solution intractable many important problems. eighteen Soft computing set techniques including genetic algorithms fuzzy logic neural networks tolerant imprecision uncertainty partial truth approximation. Soft computing introduced late 1980s successful  programs 21st century examples soft computing neural networks. Narrow . general   researchers divided whether pursue goals artificial general intelligence superintelligence directly solve many specific problems possible narrow  hopes solutions lead indirectly field long term goals. General intelligence difficult define difficult measure modern  verifiable successes focusing specific problems specific solutions. The experimental sub field artificial general intelligence studies area exclusively. Machine consciousness sentience mind The philosophy mind know whether machine mind consciousness mental states sense human beings. This issue considers internal experiences machine rather external behavior. Mainstream  research considers issue irrelevant affect goals field build machines solve problems using intelligence. Russell Norvig add additional project making machine conscious exactly way humans one equipped take. However question become central philosophy mind.  also typically central question issue artificial intelligence fiction. Consciousness David Chalmers identified two problems understanding mind named hard easy problems consciousness. The easy problem understanding brain processes signals makes plans controls behavior. The hard problem explaining feels feel like anything assuming right thinking truly feel like something Dennett consciousness illusionism says illusion. While human information processing easy explain human subjective experience difficult explain. For example easy imagine color blind person learned identify objects field view red clear would required person know red looks like. Computationalism functionalism Computationalism position philosophy mind human mind information processing system thinking form computing. Computationalism argues relationship mind body similar identical relationship software hardware thus may solution mindbody problem. This philosophical position inspired work  researchers cognitive scientists 1960s originally proposed philosophers Jerry Fodor Hilary Putnam. Philosopher John Searle characterized position strong  The appropriately programmed computer right inputs outputs would thereby mind exactly sense human beings minds.  Searle counters assertion Chinese room argument attempts show even machine perfectly simulates human behavior still reason suppose also mind. three hundred twentyeight  welfare rights  difficult impossible reliably evaluate whether advanced  sentient ability feel degree. three hundred twentynine But significant chance given machine feel suffer may entitled certain rights welfare protection measures similarly animals. three hundred thirty three hundred thirtyone Sapience set capacities related high intelligence discernment self awareness may provide another moral basis  rights. three hundred thirty Robot rights also sometimes proposed practical way integrate autonomous agents society. three hundred thirtytwo  two thousand seventeen European Union considered granting electronic personhood capable  systems. Similarly legal status companies would conferred rights also responsibilities. three hundred thirtythree Critics argued two thousand eighteen granting rights  systems would downplay importance human rights legislation focus user needs rather speculative futuristic scenarios. They also noted robots lacked autonomy take part society. three hundred thirtyfour three hundred thirtyfive Progress  increased interest topic. Proponents  welfare rights often argue  sentience emerges would particularly easy deny. They warn may moral blind spot analogous slavery factory farming could lead large scale suffering sentient  created carelessly exploited. three hundred thirtyone three hundred thirty Future Superintelligence singularity A superintelligence hypothetical agent would possess intelligence far surpassing brightest gifted human mind.  research artificial general intelligence produced sufficiently intelligent software might able reprogram improve. The improved software would even better improving leading I. J. Good called intelligence explosion Vernor Vinge called singularity. three hundred thirtysix However technologies improve exponentially indefinitely typically follow S shaped curve slowing reach physical limits technology. Transhumanism Robot designer Hans Moravec cyberneticist Kevin Warwick inventor Ray Kurzweil predicted humans machines merge future cyborgs capable powerful either. This idea called transhumanism roots Aldous Huxley Robert Ettinger. three hundred thirtyeight Edward Fredkin argues artificial intelligence next stage evolution idea first proposed Samuel Butler Darwin among Machines far back one thousand eight hundred sixtythree expanded upon George Dyson book name 1998. three hundred thirtynine  fiction Thought capable artificial beings appeared storytelling devices since antiquity three hundred forty persistent theme science fiction. A common trope works began Mary Shelley Frankenstein human creation becomes threat masters. This includes works Arthur C. Clarke Stanley Kubrick two thousand one A Space Odyssey one thousand nine hundred sixtyeight HAL nine thousand murderous computer charge Discovery One spaceship well The Terminator one thousand nine hundred eightyfour The Matrix one thousand nine hundred ninetynine.  contrast rare loyal robots Gort The Day Earth Stood Still one thousand nine hundred fiftyone Bishop Aliens one thousand nine hundred eightysix less prominent popular culture. Isaac Asimov introduced Three Laws Robotics many books stories notably Multivac series super intelligent computer name. Asimov laws often brought lay discussions machine ethics three hundred fortythree almost artificial intelligence researchers familiar Asimov laws popular culture generally consider laws useless many reasons one ambiguity. Several works use  force us confront fundamental question makes us human showing us artificial beings ability feel thus suffer. This appears Karel Capek R. YOU. R. films A. I. Artificial Intelligence  Machina well novel  Androids Dream Electric Sheep Philip K. Dick. Dick considers idea understanding human subjectivity altered technology created artificial intelligence. See also Explanatory notes b This list intelligent traits based topics covered major  textbooks including Russell Norvig two thousand twentyone Luger Stubblefield two thousand four Poole Mackworth Goebel one thousand nine hundred ninetyeight Nilsson one thousand nine hundred ninetyeight b This list tools based topics covered major  textbooks including Russell Norvig two thousand twentyone Luger Stubblefield two thousand four Poole Mackworth Goebel one thousand nine hundred ninetyeight Nilsson one thousand nine hundred ninetyeight  among reasons expert systems proved inefficient capturing knowledge. Rational agent general term used economics philosophy theoretical artificial intelligence.  refer anything directs behavior accomplish goals person animal corporation nation case  computer program. Alan Turing discussed centrality learning early one thousand nine hundred fifty classic paper Computing Machinery Intelligence.  one thousand nine hundred fiftysix original Dartmouth  summer conference Ray Solomonoff wrote report unsupervised probabilistic machine learning  Inductive Inference Machine. See  winter Machine translation ALPAC report one thousand nine hundred sixtysix Compared symbolic logic formal Bayesian inference computationally expensive. For inference tractable observations must conditionally independent one another. AdSense uses Bayesian network three hundred million edges learn ads serve. Expectationmaximization one popular algorithms machine learning allows clustering presence unknown latent variables. Some form deep neural networks without specific learning algorithm described Alan Turing one thousand nine hundred fortyeight Frank Rosenblatt one thousand nine hundred fiftyseven Karl Steinbuch Roger David Joseph one thousand nine hundred sixtyone. Deep recurrent networks learned used gradient descent developed Ernst Ising Wilhelm Lenz one thousand nine hundred twentyfive Oliver Selfridge one thousand nine hundred fiftynine Alexey Ivakhnenko Valentin Lapa one thousand nine hundred sixtyfive Kaoru Nakano one thousand nine hundred seventyseven Shun Ichi Amari one thousand nine hundred seventytwo John Joseph Hopfield one thousand nine hundred eightytwo. Backpropagation independently discovered Henry J. Kelley one thousand nine hundred sixty Arthur E. Bryson one thousand nine hundred sixtytwo Stuart Dreyfus one thousand nine hundred sixtytwo Arthur E. Bryson  Chi Ho one thousand nine hundred sixtynine Seppo Linnainmaa one thousand nine hundred seventy Paul Werbos one thousand nine hundred seventyfour.  fact backpropagation gradient descent straight forward applications Gottfried Leibniz chain rule calculus one thousand six hundred seventysix essentially identical one layer method least squares developed independently Johann Carl Friedrich Gauss one thousand seven hundred ninetyfive Adrien Marie Legendre one thousand eight hundred five. There probably many others yet discovered historians science. Geoffrey Hinton said work neural networks 1990s labeled datasets thousands times small. And computers millions times slow one hundred twentyfour Including Jon Kleinberg Cornell University Sendhil Mullainathan University Chicago Cynthia Chouldechova Carnegie Mellon Sam Corbett Davis Stanford Moritz Hardt director Max Planck Institute Intelligent Systems argues machine learning fundamentally wrong tool lot domains trying design interventions mechanisms change world. one hundred eightyseven When law passed two thousand eighteen still contained form provision. This United Nations definition includes things like land mines well. See table four nine OECD average YOU. S. average. Sometimes called robopocalypse. Electronic brain term used press around time. two hundred seventy Daniel Crevier wrote conference generally recognized official birthdate new science. Russell Norvig called conference inception artificial intelligence. Russell Norvig wrote next twenty years field would dominated people students. Russell Norvig wrote astonishing whenever computer anything kind smartish. The programs described Arthur Samuel checkers program IBM seven hundred one Daniel Bobrow STUDENT Newell Simon Logic Theorist Terry Winograd SHRDLU. Russell Norvig write almost cases early systems failed difficult problems Embodied approaches  championed Hans Moravec Rodney Brooks went many names Nouvelle . Developmental robotics two hundred ninety Matteo Wong wrote The Atlantic Whereas decades computer science fields natural language processing computer vision robotics used extremely different methods use programming method called deep learning. As result code approaches become similar models easier integrate one another. Jack Clark wrote Bloomberg After half decade quiet breakthroughs artificial intelligence two thousand fifteen landmark year. Computers smarter learning faster ever noted number software projects use machine learning Google increased sporadic usage two thousand twelve two seven hundred projects 2015. Nils Nilsson wrote one thousand nine hundred eightythree Simply put wide disagreement field . Daniel Crevier wrote time proven accuracy perceptiveness Dreyfus comments. Had formulated less aggressively constructive actions suggested might taken much earlier. Searle presented definition Strong  1999. Searle original formulation The appropriately programmed computer really mind sense computers given right programs literally said understand cognitive states. Strong  defined similarly Russell Norvig Stong  assertion machines actually thinking opposed simulating thinking. References  set exceed human brain power Archived two thousand eight two nineteen Wayback Machine CNN. com July twentysix two thousand six Kaplan Andreas Haenlein Michael two thousand nineteen. Siri Siri hand Who fairest land  interpretations illustrations implications artificial intelligence. Business Horizons. sixtytwo 1525. doi . 1016 j. bushor. 2018. . 004. S2CID one hundred fiftyeight million four hundred thirtythree thousand seven hundred thirtysix. b c Copeland J. . two thousand four. The Essential Turing ideas gave birth computer age. Oxford England Clarendon Press. ISBN zero nineteen eight hundred twentyfive thousand seventynine seven. b Dartmouth workshop The proposal b Successful programs 1960s b Funding initiatives early 1980s Fifth Generation Project Japan Alvey  Microelectronics Computer Technology Corporation  Strategic Computing Initiative  b First  Winter Lighthill report Mansfield Amendment b Second  Winter b Deep learning revolution AlexNet b c Artificial general intelligence Proposal modern version Warnings overspecialization  leading researchers Russell Norvig two thousand twentyone . . Problem solving puzzle solving game playing deduction Russell Norvig two thousand twentyone chpt. thirtyfive Russell Norvig two thousand twentyone chpt. six constraint satisfaction Poole Mackworth Goebel one thousand nine hundred ninetyeight chpt. two three seven nine Luger Stubblefield two thousand four chpt. three four six eight Nilsson one thousand nine hundred ninetyeight chpt. seven hundred twelve Uncertain reasoning b c Intractability efficiency combinatorial explosion b c Psychological evidence prevalence sub symbolic reasoning knowledge Knowledge representation knowledge engineering Russell Norvig two thousand twentyone chpt. ten Poole Mackworth Goebel one thousand nine hundred ninetyeight . two thousand three hundred fortysix six thousand nine hundred eightyone one hundred sixtynine thousand two hundred thirtythree two hundred thirtyfive thousand two hundred seventyseven two hundred eightyone thousand two hundred ninetyeight three hundred nineteen thousand three hundred fortyfive Luger Stubblefield two thousand four . two hundred twentyseven thousand two hundred fortythree Nilsson one thousand nine hundred ninetyeight chpt. . 117.  eighteen Representing categories relations Semantic networks description logics inheritance including frames scripts Representing events time Situation calculus event calculus fluent calculus including solving frame problem Causal calculus Representing knowledge knowledge Belief calculus modal logics b Default reasoning Frame problem default logic non monotonic logics circumscription closed world assumption abduction Poole  al. places abduction default reasoning. Luger  al. places uncertain reasoning. b Breadth commonsense knowledge Automated planning Automated decision making Decision theory Classical planning Sensorless conformant planning contingent planning replanning a. k. a online planning Uncertain preferences Inverse reinforcement learning Information value theory Markov decision process Game theory multi agent decision theory Learning Unsupervised learning b Supervised learning Reinforcement learning Transfer learning Artificial Intelligence  What   How Does  Work Built . builtin. com. Retrieved thirty October two thousand twentythree. Computational learning theory Natural language processing NLP Subproblems NLP Modern statistical deep learning approaches NLP Computer vision Challa  al. two thousand eleven. Affective computing Search algorithms State space search Uninformed searches breadth first search depth first search general state space search Heuristic informed searches e. g. greedy best first A Adversarial search Local optimization search Singh Chauhan Nagesh eighteen December two thousand twenty. Optimization Algorithms Neural Networks. KDnuggets. Retrieved thirteen January two thousand twentyfour. Evolutionary computation Logic Propositional logic First order logic features equality Logical inference logical deduction search Resolution unification Warren D. H. Pereira L. M. Pereira F. one thousand nine hundred seventyseven. Prolog language implementation compared Lisp. ACM SIGPLAN Notices. twelve eight 109115. doi . 1145 872734. 806939. Fuzzy logic b Stochastic methods uncertain reasoning decision theory decision analysis Information value theory Markov decision processes dynamic decision networks b c Stochastic temporal models Hidden Markov model Kalman filters Dynamic Bayesian networks Game theory mechanism design Bayesian networks Russell Norvig two thousand twentyone . 512.  . 413.  . 314.  .  .  .  Poole Mackworth Goebel one thousand nine hundred ninetyeight . three hundred sixtyone thousand three hundred eightyone Luger Stubblefield two thousand four . one hundred eightytwo thousand one hundred ninety three hundred sixtythree thousand three hundred seventynine Nilsson one thousand nine hundred ninetyeight chpt. .  Bayesian inference algorithm Bayesian learning expectationmaximization algorithm Bayesian decision theory Bayesian decision networks Statistical learning methods classifiers Decision trees Non parameteric learning models K nearest neighbor support vector machines Naive Bayes classifier b Neural networks Gradient calculation computational graphs backpropagation automatic differentiation Universal approximation theorem The theorem Feedforward neural networks Recurrent neural networks Perceptrons b Deep learning Convolutional neural networks Quoted Christian two thousand twenty p. twentytwo Explained Generative . nine November 2023.  Writing Content Creation Tools. MIT Sloan Teaching Learning Technologies. Retrieved twentyfive December two thousand twentythree. Thomason James twentyone May two thousand twentyfour. Mojo Rising The resurgence  first programming languages. VentureBeat. Retrieved twentysix May two thousand twentyfour. Wodecki Ben five May two thousand twentythree. seven  Programming Languages You Need Know.  Business. Davenport T Kalakota ARE June two thousand nineteen. The potential artificial intelligence healthcare. Future Healthc J. six two 9498. doi . 7861 futurehosp.  two ninetyfour. PMC six million six hundred sixteen thousand one hundred eightyone. PMID thirtyone million three hundred sixtythree thousand five hundred thirteen. b Bax Monique Thorpe Jordan Romanov Valentin December two thousand twentythree. The future personalized cardiovascular medicine demands   printing stem cells artificial intelligence. Frontiers Sensors. four. doi . 3389 fsens. 2023. 1294721. ISSN two thousand six hundred seventythree five thousand sixtyseven. Jumper J Evans R Pritzel A two thousand twentyone. Highly accurate protein structure prediction AlphaFold. Nature. five hundred ninetysix seven thousand eight hundred seventythree 583589. Bibcode 2021Natur. 596.. 583J. doi . 1038 s41586 twentyone three thousand eight hundred nineteen two. PMC eight million three hundred seventyone thousand six hundred five. PMID thirtyfour million two hundred sixtyfive thousand eight hundred fortyfour.  discovers new class antibiotics kill drug resistant bacteria. twenty December 2023.  speeds drug design Parkinson ten fold. Cambridge University. seventeen April 2024. Horne Robert I. Andrzejewska Ewa A. Alam Parvez Brotzakis Z. Faidon Srivastava Ankit Aubert Alice Nowinska Magdalena Gregory Rebecca C. Staats Roxine Possenti Andrea Chia Sean Sormanni Pietro Ghetti Bernardino Caughey Byron Knowles Tuomas P. J. Vendruscolo Michele seventeen April two thousand twentyfour. Discovery potent inhibitors synuclein aggregation using structure based iterative learning. Nature Chemical Biology. twenty five. Nature 634645. doi . 1038 s41589 twentyfour one thousand five hundred eighty x. PMC eleven million sixtytwo thousand nine hundred three. PMID thirtyeight million six hundred thirtytwo thousand four hundred ninetytwo. Grant Eugene F. Lardner Rex twentyfive July one thousand nine hundred fiftytwo. The Talk Town . The New Yorker. ISSN twentyeight 792X. Retrieved twentyeight January two thousand twentyfour. Anderson Mark Robert eleven May two thousand seventeen. Twenty years Deep Blue  Kasparov chess match started big data revolution. The Conversation. Retrieved twentyeight January two thousand twentyfour. Markoff John sixteen February two thousand eleven. Computer Wins Jeopardy Trivial  Not. The New York Times. ISSN three hundred sixtytwo four thousand three hundred thirtyone. Retrieved twentyeight January two thousand twentyfour. Byford Sam twentyseven May two thousand seventeen. AlphaGo retires competitive  defeating world number one thirty. The Verge. Retrieved twentyeight January two thousand twentyfour. Brown Noam Sandholm Tuomas thirty August two thousand nineteen. Superhuman  multiplayer poker. Science. three hundred sixtyfive six thousand four hundred fiftysix 885890. Bibcode 2019Sci... 365.. 885B. doi . 1126 science. aay2400. ISSN thirtysix eight thousand seventyfive. PMID thirtyone million two hundred ninetysix thousand six hundred fifty. MuZero Mastering  chess shogi Atari without rules. Google DeepMind. twentythree December two thousand twenty. Retrieved twentyeight January two thousand twentyfour. Sample Ian thirty October two thousand nineteen.  becomes grandmaster fiendishly complex StarCraft . The Guardian. ISSN two hundred sixtyone three thousand seventyseven. Retrieved twentyeight January two thousand twentyfour. Wurman P. R. Barrett S. Kawamoto K. two thousand twentytwo. Outracing champion Gran Turismo drivers deep reinforcement learning. Nature. six hundred two seven thousand eight hundred ninetysix 223228. Bibcode 2022Natur. 602.. 223W. doi . 1038 s41586 twentyone four thousand three hundred fiftyseven seven. PMID thirtyfive million one hundred forty thousand three hundred eightyfour. Matthew Finio Amanda Downie IBM Think two thousand twentyfour Primer What Artificial Intelligence  Finance eight December two thousand twentythree M. Nicolas J. Firzli Pensions Age European Pensions magazine Artificial Intelligence Ask Industry May June two thousand twentyfour b c Congressional Research Service two thousand nineteen. Artificial Intelligence National Security PDF. Washington  Congressional Research Service.  notice b Slyusar Vadym two thousand nineteen. Artificial intelligence basis future control networks. ResearchGate. doi . 13140 . . . 30247. 50087. Knight Will. The  thirty Other Nations Agree Set Guardrails Military . Wired. ISSN one thousand fiftynine one thousand twentyeight. Retrieved twentyfour January two thousand twentyfour. Marcelline Marco twentyseven May two thousand twentythree. ChatGPT Most Americans Know About  But Few Actually Use  Chatbot. PCMag. Retrieved twentyeight January two thousand twentyfour. Lu Donna thirtyone March two thousand twentythree. Misinformation mistakes Pope puffer rapidly evolving . The Guardian. ISSN two hundred sixtyone three thousand seventyseven. Retrieved twentyeight January two thousand twentyfour. Hurst Luke twentythree May two thousand twentythree. How fake image Pentagon explosion shared Twitter caused real dip Wall Street. euronews. Retrieved twentyeight January two thousand twentyfour. Ransbotham Sam Kiron David Gerbert Philipp Reeves Martin six September two thousand seventeen. Reshaping Business With Artificial Intelligence. MIT Sloan Management Review. Archived original thirteen February 2024. Kopel Matthew. Copyright Services Fair Use. Cornell University Library. Retrieved twentysix April two thousand twentyfour. Burgess Matt. How Stop Your Data From Being Used Train . Wired. ISSN one thousand fiftynine one thousand twentyeight. Retrieved twentysix April two thousand twentyfour. Getting Innovation Ecosystem Ready .   policy toolkit PDF. WIPO. Rainie Lee Keeter Scott Perrin Andrew twentytwo July two thousand nineteen. Trust Distrust America. Pew Research Center. Archived original twentytwo February 2024. Berdahl  al. two thousand twentythree Goffrey two thousand eight p. seventeen Rose two thousand twentythree Russell Norvig two thousand twentyone p. nine hundred ninetyfive Algorithmic bias Fairness machine learning Christian two thousand twenty . six thousand seven hundred seventy Russell Norvig two thousand twentyone . nine hundred ninetythree thousand nine hundred ninetyfour Russell Norvig two thousand twentyone p. nine hundred ninetyfive Lipartito two thousand eleven p. thirtysix Goodman Flaxman two thousand seventeen p. six Christian two thousand twenty . three thousand nine hundred forty sixtyfive Quoted Christian two thousand twenty p. sixtyfive. Russell Norvig two thousand twentyone p. nine hundred ninetyfour Christian two thousand twenty . forty eight thousand eightyone Quoted Christian two thousand twenty p. eighty Black Box . sixteen June 2023. Christian two thousand twenty p. eightythree Russell Norvig two thousand twentyone p. nine hundred ninetyseven Robitzski two thousand eighteen Sainato two thousand fifteen Buckley Chris Mozur Paul twentytwo May two thousand nineteen. How China Uses High Tech Surveillance Subdue Minorities. The New York Times. Security lapse exposed Chinese smart city surveillance system. three May 2019. Archived original seven March two thousand twentyone. Retrieved fourteen September two thousand twenty. Metz Cade ten July two thousand twentythree.  Age A. I. Tech Little Guys Need Big Friends. New York Times. b E McGaughey Will Robots Automate Your Job Away Full Employment Basic Income Economic Democracy two thousand twentytwo fiftyone three Industrial Law Journal five hundred eleven thousand five hundred fiftynine Archived twentyseven May two thousand twentythree Wayback Machine Ford Colvin two thousand fifteen McGaughey two thousand twentytwo Lohr two thousand seventeen Frey Osborne two thousand seventeen Arntz Gregory Zierahn two thousand sixteen p. thirtythree Zhou Viola eleven April two thousand twentythree.  already taking video game illustrators jobs China. Rest World. Retrieved seventeen August two thousand twentythree. Carter Justin eleven April two thousand twentythree. China game art industry reportedly decimated growing  use. Game Developer. Retrieved seventeen August two thousand twentythree. Mahdawi two thousand seventeen Thompson two thousand fourteen Tarnoff Ben four August two thousand twentythree. Lessons Eliza. The Guardian Weekly. . 3439. Bostrom two thousand fourteen Muller Bostrom two thousand fourteen Bostrom two thousand fifteen. Leaders concerns existential risks  around two thousand fifteen Taylor Josh seven May two thousand twentythree. Rise artificial intelligence inevitable feared father  says. The Guardian. Retrieved twentysix May two thousand twentythree. Colton Emma seven May two thousand twentythree. Father  says tech fears misplaced You stop. Fox News. Retrieved twentysix May two thousand twentythree. Jones Hessie twentythree May two thousand twentythree. Juergen Schmidhuber Renowned Father  Modern  Says His Life Work Will Lead  Dystopia. Forbes. Retrieved twentysix May two thousand twentythree. McMorrow Ryan nineteen December two thousand twentythree. Andrew   think world better less intelligence. Financial Times. Retrieved thirty December two thousand twentythree. Levy Steven twentytwo December two thousand twentythree. How Not  Stupid About  With Yann LeCun. Wired. Retrieved thirty December two thousand twentythree. Arguments  imminent risk b Anderson Anderson two thousand eleven. Melton Ashley Stewart Monica. Hugging Face CEO says focused building sustainable model .  billion open source  startup. Business Insider. Retrieved fourteen April two thousand twentyfour. cite web CS1 maint multiple names authors list link Wiggers Kyle nine April two thousand twentyfour. Google open sources tools support  model development. TechCrunch. Retrieved fourteen April two thousand twentyfour. Heaven Will Douglas twelve May two thousand twentythree. The open source  boom built Big Tech handouts. How long last. MIT Technology Review. Retrieved fourteen April two thousand twentyfour. Brodsky Sascha nineteen December two thousand twentythree. Mistral  New Language Model Aims Open Source Supremacy.  Business. Edwards Benj twentytwo February two thousand twentyfour. Stability announces Stable Diffusion three next gen  image generator. Ars Technica. Retrieved fourteen April two thousand twentyfour. Marshall Matt twentynine January two thousand twentyfour. How enterprises using open source LLMs sixteen examples. VentureBeat. Piper Kelsey two February two thousand twentyfour. Should make powerful  models open source. Vox. Retrieved fourteen April two thousand twentyfour. Alan Turing Institute two thousand nineteen. Understanding artificial intelligence ethics safety PDF. Alan Turing Institute two thousand twentythree.  Ethics Governance Practice PDF. Floridi Luciano Cowls Josh twentythree June two thousand nineteen. A Unified Framework Five Principles  Society. Harvard Data Science Review. one one. doi . 1162 99608f92. 8cd550d1. S2CID one hundred ninetyeight million seven hundred seventyfive thousand seven hundred thirteen. Buruk Banu Ekmekci Perihan Elif Arda Berna one September two thousand twenty. A critical perspective guidelines responsible trustworthy artificial intelligence. Medicine Health Care Philosophy. twentythree three 387399. doi . 1007 s11019 twenty nine thousand nine hundred fortyeight one. ISSN one thousand five hundred seventytwo eight thousand six hundred thirtythree. PMID thirtytwo million two hundred thirtysix thousand seven hundred ninetyfour. S2CID two hundred fourteen million seven hundred sixtysix thousand eight hundred. Kamila Manoj Kumar Jasrotia Sahil Singh one January two thousand twentythree. Ethical issues development artificial intelligence recognizing risks. International Journal Ethics Systems. ahead print ahead print. doi . 1108 IJOES five two thousand twentythree one hundred seven. ISSN two thousand five hundred fourteen nine thousand three hundred sixtynine. S2CID two hundred fiftynine million six hundred fourteen thousand one hundred twentyfour.  Safety Institute releases new  safety evaluations platform.  Government. ten May two thousand twentyfour. Retrieved fourteen May two thousand twentyfour. Regulation  mitigate risks VOA News twentyfive October two thousand twentythree.  Announces Advisory Body Artificial Intelligence. Milmo Dan three November two thousand twentythree. Hope Horror The great  debate dividing pioneers. The Guardian Weekly. . 1012. The Bletchley Declaration Countries Attending  Safety Summit twelve November two thousand twentythree. GOV. . one November 2023. Archived original one November two thousand twentythree. Retrieved two November two thousand twentythree. Countries agree safe responsible development frontier  landmark Bletchley Declaration. GOV.  Press release. Archived original one November two thousand twentythree. Retrieved one November two thousand twentythree. Second global  summit secures safety commitments companies. Reuters. twentyone May two thousand twentyfour. Retrieved twentythree May two thousand twentyfour. Frontier  Safety Commitments  Seoul Summit two thousand twentyfour. gov. . twentyone May 2024. Archived original twentythree May two thousand twentyfour. Retrieved twentythree May two thousand twentyfour. Google books ngram.  immediate precursors b Turing original publication Turing test Computing machinery intelligence Historical influence philosophical implications Simon one thousand nine hundred sixtyfive p. ninetysix quoted Crevier one thousand nine hundred ninetythree p. one hundred nine Minsky one thousand nine hundred sixtyseven p. two quoted Crevier one thousand nine hundred ninetythree p. one hundred nine Expert systems Developmental robotics Formal narrow methods adopted 1990s  widely used late 1990s Moore Law  Big data Sagar Ram three June two thousand twenty. OpenAI Releases GPT three The Largest Model  Far. Analytics India Magazine. Archived original four August two thousand twenty. Retrieved fifteen March two thousand twentythree. What  Artificial Intelligence . Google Cloud Platform. Archived original thirtyone July two thousand twentythree. Retrieved sixteen October two thousand twentythree. Haugeland one thousand nine hundred eightyfive . 112117. Physical symbol system hypothesis Historical significance Moravec paradox Dreyfus critique  Historical significance philosophical implications Neats . scruffies historic debate A classic example scruffy approach intelligence A modern example neat  aspirations 21st century Searle Chinese room argument Discussion Leith Sam seven July two thousand twentytwo. Nick Bostrom How certain machine conscious. The Spectator. Retrieved twentythree February two thousand twentyfour. b c Thomson Jonny thirtyone October two thousand twentytwo. Why robots rights. Big Think. Retrieved twentythree February two thousand twentyfour. b Kateman Brian twentyfour July two thousand twentythree.  Should  Terrified Humans. Time. Retrieved twentythree February two thousand twentyfour. Wong Jeff ten July two thousand twentythree. What leaders need know robot rights. Fast Company. Hern Alex twelve January two thousand seventeen. Give robots personhood status  committee argues. The Guardian. ISSN two hundred sixtyone three thousand seventyseven. Retrieved twentythree February two thousand twentyfour. Dovey Dana fourteen April two thousand eighteen. Experts  Think Robots Should Have Rights. Newsweek. Retrieved twentythree February two thousand twentyfour. Cuddy Alice thirteen April two thousand eighteen. Robot rights violate human rights experts warn . euronews. Retrieved twentythree February two thousand twentyfour. The Intelligence explosion technological singularity I. J. Good intelligence explosion Vernor Vinge singularity Transhumanism  evolution  myth Anderson two thousand eight.  textbooks The two widely used textbooks 2023. See Open Syllabus. These four widely used  textbooks two thousand eight Luger George Stubblefield William two thousand four. Artificial Intelligence Structures Strategies Complex Problem Solving 5th .. Benjamin Cummings. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight zero eight thousand fiftythree four thousand seven hundred eighty seven. Archived original twentysix July two thousand twenty. Retrieved seventeen December two thousand nineteen. Nilsson Nils one thousand nine hundred ninetyeight. Artificial Intelligence A New Synthesis. Morgan Kaufmann. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight one fiftyfive thousand eight hundred sixty four hundred sixtyseven four. Archived original twentysix July two thousand twenty. Retrieved eighteen November two thousand nineteen. Russell Stuart J. Norvig Peter two thousand three Artificial Intelligence A Modern Approach 2nd . Upper Saddle River New Jersey Prentice Hall ISBN zero thirteen seven hundred ninety thousand three hundred ninetyfive two. Poole David Mackworth Alan Goebel Randy one thousand nine hundred ninetyeight. Computational Intelligence A Logical Approach. New York Oxford University Press. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight zero nineteen five hundred ten thousand two hundred seventy three. Archived original twentysix July two thousand twenty. Retrieved twentytwo August two thousand twenty. Later editions. History  Crevier Daniel one thousand nine hundred ninetythree.  The Tumultuous Search Artificial Intelligence. New York  BasicBooks. ISBN zero four hundred sixtyfive two thousand nine hundred ninetyseven three.. McCorduck Pamela two thousand four Machines Who Think 2nd . Natick  A. K. Peters Ltd. ISBN one fiftysix thousand eight hundred eightyone two hundred five one. Newquist H. P. one thousand nine hundred ninetyfour. The Brain Makers Genius Ego And Greed  The Quest For Machines That Think. New York Macmillan SAMS. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight zero six hundred seventytwo thirty thousand four hundred twelve five. Other sources   Fusion   Fusion video lecture Archived two July two thousand twentythree Wayback Machine AlphaGo Google DeepMind. Archived original ten March 2016. Alter Alexandra Harris Elizabeth A. twenty September two thousand twentythree Franzen Grisham Other Prominent Authors Sue OpenAI The New York Times Altman Sam Brockman Greg Sutskever Ilya twentytwo May two thousand twentythree. Governance Superintelligence. openai. com. Archived original twentyseven May two thousand twentythree. Retrieved twentyseven May two thousand twentythree. Anderson Susan Leigh two thousand eight. Asimov three laws robotics machine metaethics.  Society. twentytwo four 477493. doi . 1007 s00146 seven ninetyfour five. S2CID one million eight hundred nine thousand four hundred fiftynine. Anderson Michael Anderson Susan Leigh two thousand eleven. Machine Ethics. Cambridge University Press. Arntz Melanie Gregory Terry Zierahn Ulrich two thousand sixteen The risk automation jobs OECD countries A comparative analysis OECD Social Employment Migration Working Papers one hundred eightynine Asada M. Hosoda K. Kuniyoshi Y. Ishiguro H. Inui T. Yoshikawa Y. Ogino M. Yoshida C. two thousand nine. Cognitive developmental robotics survey. IEEE Transactions Autonomous Mental Development. one one 1234. doi . 1109 tamd. 2009. 2021702. S2CID ten million one hundred sixtyeight thousand seven hundred seventythree. Ask  experts What driving today progress . McKinsey Company. Archived original thirteen April two thousand eighteen. Retrieved thirteen April two thousand eighteen. Barfield Woodrow Pagallo Ugo two thousand eighteen. Research handbook law artificial intelligence. Cheltenham  Edward Elgar Publishing. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight one seventyeight thousand six hundred fortythree nine hundred four eight. OCLC one billion thirtynine million four hundred eighty thousand eightyfive. Beal J. Winston Patrick two thousand nine The New Frontier Human Level Artificial Intelligence IEEE Intelligent Systems twentyfour two thousand one hundred twentyfour doi . 1109 MIS. 2009.  hdl 1721.  fiftytwo thousand three hundred fiftyseven S2CID thirtytwo million four hundred thirtyseven thousand seven hundred thirteen Berdahl Carl Thomas Baker Lawrence Mann Sean Osoba Osonde Girosi Federico seven February two thousand twentythree. Strategies Improve Impact Artificial Intelligence Health Equity Scoping Review. JMIR . two e42936. doi . 2196 fortytwo thousand nine hundred thirtysix. ISSN two thousand eight hundred seventeen one thousand seven hundred five. PMC eleven million fortyone thousand four hundred fiftynine. S2CID two hundred fiftysix million six hundred eightyone thousand four hundred thirtynine. Berlinski David two thousand. The Advent Algorithm. Harcourt Books. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight zero fifteen six hundred one thousand three hundred ninetyone eight. OCLC fortysix million eight hundred ninety thousand six hundred eightytwo. Archived original twentysix July two thousand twenty. Retrieved twentytwo August two thousand twenty. Berryhill Jamie Heang Kevin Kok Clogher Rob McBride Keegan two thousand nineteen. Hello World Artificial Intelligence Use Public Sector PDF. Paris OECD Observatory Public Sector Innovation. Archived PDF original twenty December two thousand nineteen. Retrieved nine August two thousand twenty. Bertini M Del Bimbo A Torniai C two thousand six. Automatic annotation semantic retrieval video sequences using multimedia ontologies.  six Proceedings 14th ACM international conference Multimedia. 14th ACM international conference Multimedia. Santa Barbara ACM. . 679682. Bostrom Nick two thousand fourteen. Superintelligence Paths Dangers Strategies. Oxford University Press. Bostrom Nick two thousand fifteen. What happens computers get smarter. TED conference. Archived original twentyfive July two thousand twenty. Retrieved thirty January two thousand twenty. Brooks Rodney ten November two thousand fourteen. artificial intelligence tool threat. Archived original twelve November 2014. Brooks Rodney one thousand nine hundred ninety. Elephants  Play Chess PDF. Robotics Autonomous Systems. six twelve 315. CiteSeerX . . . 588. 7539. doi . 1016 S0921 eight thousand eight hundred ninety five eighty thousand twentyfive nine. Archived PDF original nine August 2007. Buiten Miriam C two thousand nineteen. Towards Intelligent Regulation Artificial Intelligence. European Journal Risk Regulation. ten one 4159. doi . 1017 err. 2019. . ISSN one thousand eight hundred sixtyseven 299X. Bushwick Sophie sixteen March two thousand twentythree What New GPT four  Can  Scientific American Butler Samuel thirteen June one thousand eight hundred sixtythree. Darwin among Machines. Letters Editor. The Press. Christchurch New Zealand. Archived original nineteen September two thousand eight. Retrieved sixteen October two thousand fourteen via Victoria University Wellington. Buttazzo G. July two thousand one. Artificial consciousness Utopia real possibility. Computer. thirtyfour seven 2430. doi . 1109 . 933500. Cambria Erik White Bebo May two thousand fourteen. Jumping NLP Curves A Review Natural Language Processing Research Review Article. IEEE Computational Intelligence Magazine. nine two 4857. doi . 1109 MCI. 2014. 2307227. S2CID two hundred six million four hundred fiftyone thousand nine hundred eightysix. Cellan Jones Rory two December two thousand fourteen. Stephen Hawking warns artificial intelligence could end mankind. BBC News. Archived original thirty October two thousand fifteen. Retrieved thirty October two thousand fifteen. Chalmers David one thousand nine hundred ninetyfive. Facing problem consciousness. Journal Consciousness Studies. two three 200219. Archived original eight March two thousand five. Retrieved eleven October two thousand eighteen. Challa Subhash Moreland Mark R. Musicki Darko Evans Robin J. two thousand eleven. Fundamentals Object Tracking. Cambridge University Press. doi . 1017 CBO9780511975837. Christian Brian two thousand twenty. The Alignment Problem Machine learning human values. W. W. Norton Company. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight zero three hundred ninetythree eightysix thousand eight hundred thirtythree three. OCLC one billion two hundred thirtythree million two hundred sixtysix thousand seven hundred fiftythree. Ciresan D. Meier YOU. Schmidhuber J. two thousand twelve. Multi column deep neural networks image classification. two thousand twelve IEEE Conference Computer Vision Pattern Recognition. . 36423649. arXiv 1202. 2745. doi . 1109 cvpr. 2012. 6248110. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight one four thousand six hundred seventythree one thousand two hundred twentyeight eight. S2CID two million one hundred sixtyone thousand five hundred ninetytwo. Clark Jack 2015b. Why two thousand fifteen Was Breakthrough Year Artificial Intelligence. Bloomberg. com. Archived original twentythree November two thousand sixteen. Retrieved twentythree November two thousand sixteen. CNA twelve January two thousand nineteen. Commentary Bad news. Artificial intelligence biased. CNA. Archived original twelve January two thousand nineteen. Retrieved nineteen June two thousand twenty. Cybenko G. one thousand nine hundred eightyeight. Continuous valued neural networks two hidden layers sufficient Report. Department Computer Science Tufts University. Deng L.  D. two thousand fourteen. Deep Learning Methods Applications PDF. Foundations Trends Signal Processing. seven thirtyfour 1199. doi . 1561 two billion thirtynine. Archived PDF original fourteen March two thousand sixteen. Retrieved eighteen October two thousand fourteen. Dennett Daniel one thousand nine hundred ninetyone. Consciousness Explained. The Penguin Press. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight zero seven thousand one hundred thirtynine nine thousand thirtyseven nine. DiFeliciantonio Chase three April two thousand twentythree.  already changed world. This report shows. San Francisco Chronicle. Archived original nineteen June two thousand twentythree. Retrieved nineteen June two thousand twentythree. Dickson Ben two May two thousand twentytwo. Machine learning What transformer architecture. TechTalks. Retrieved twentytwo November two thousand twentythree. Dockrill Peter twentyseven June two thousand twentytwo Robots With Flawed  Make Sexist And Racist Decisions Experiment Shows Science Alert archived original twentyseven June two thousand twentytwo Domingos Pedro two thousand fifteen. The Master Algorithm How Quest Ultimate Learning Machine Will Remake Our World. Basic Books. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight four hundred sixtyfive million sixtyfive thousand seven hundred seven. Dreyfus Hubert one thousand nine hundred seventytwo. What Computers Can . New York MIT Press. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight zero six eleven thousand eightytwo six. Dreyfus Hubert Dreyfus Stuart one thousand nine hundred eightysix. Mind Machine The Power Human Intuition Expertise Era Computer. Oxford Blackwell. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight zero two nine hundred eight thousand sixty three. Archived original twentysix July two thousand twenty. Retrieved twentytwo August two thousand twenty. Dyson George one thousand nine hundred ninetyeight. Darwin among Machines. Allan Lane Science. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight zero seven thousand three hundred eightytwo thirty nine. Archived original twentysix July two thousand twenty. Retrieved twentytwo August two thousand twenty. Edelson Edward one thousand nine hundred ninetyone. The Nervous System. New York Chelsea House. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight zero seven thousand nine hundred ten four hundred sixtyfour seven. Archived original twentysix July two thousand twenty. Retrieved eighteen November two thousand nineteen. Edwards Benj seventeen May two thousand twentythree. Poll  poses risk humanity according majority Americans. Ars Technica. Archived original nineteen June two thousand twentythree. Retrieved nineteen June two thousand twentythree. Evans Woody two thousand fifteen. Posthuman Rights Dimensions Transhuman Worlds. Teknokultura. twelve two. doi . 5209 rev . 2015. v12. . 49072. Fearn Nicholas two thousand seven. The Latest Answers Oldest Questions A Philosophical Adventure World Greatest Thinkers. New York Grove Press. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight zero eight thousand twentyone one thousand eight hundred thirtynine four. Ford Martin Colvin Geoff six September two thousand fifteen. Will robots create jobs destroy. The Guardian. Archived original sixteen June two thousand eighteen. Retrieved thirteen January two thousand eighteen. Fox News two thousand twentythree. Fox News Poll PDF. Fox News. Archived PDF original twelve May two thousand twentythree. Retrieved nineteen June two thousand twentythree. Frank Michael twentytwo September two thousand twentythree.  Leadership Artificial Intelligence Can Shape 21st Century Global Order. The Diplomat. Retrieved eight December two thousand twentythree. Instead United States developed new area dominance rest world views mixture awe envy resentment artificial intelligence... From  models research cloud computing venture capital YOU. S. companies universities research labs affiliates allied countries appear enormous lead developing cutting edge  commercializing. The value YOU. S. venture capital investments  start ups exceeds rest world combined. Frey Carl Benedikt Osborne Michael A one January two thousand seventeen. The future employment How susceptible jobs computerisation. Technological Forecasting Social Change. one hundred fourteen 254280. CiteSeerX . . . 395. 416. doi . 1016 j. techfore. 2016. . 019. ISSN forty one thousand six hundred twentyfive. From working neural networking. The Economist. 2016. Archived original thirtyone December two thousand sixteen. Retrieved twentysix April two thousand eighteen. Galvan Jill one January one thousand nine hundred ninetyseven. Entering Posthuman Collective Philip K. Dick  Androids Dream Electric Sheep. Science Fiction Studies. twentyfour three 413429. JSTOR four million two hundred forty thousand six hundred fortyfour. Geist Edward Moore nine August two thousand fifteen.  artificial intelligence really existential threat humanity. Bulletin Atomic Scientists. Archived original thirty October two thousand fifteen. Retrieved thirty October two thousand fifteen. Gertner Jon eighteen July two thousand twentythree. Wikipedia Moment Truth Can online encyclopedia help teach A. I. chatbots get facts right without destroying process comment. The New York Times. Archived original eighteen July two thousand twentythree. Retrieved nineteen July two thousand twentythree. Gibbs Samuel twentyseven October two thousand fourteen. Elon Musk artificial intelligence biggest existential threat. The Guardian. Archived original thirty October two thousand fifteen. Retrieved thirty October two thousand fifteen. Goffrey Andrew two thousand eight. Algorithm.  Fuller Matthew .. Software studies lexicon. Cambridge Mass. MIT Press. . fifteen . ISBN nine hundred seventyeight one four thousand three hundred fiftysix four thousand seven hundred eightyseven nine. Goldman Sharon fourteen September two thousand twentytwo. ten years later deep learning revolution rages say  pioneers Hinton LeCun . VentureBeat. Retrieved eight December two thousand twentythree. Good I. J. one thousand nine hundred sixtyfive Speculations Concerning First Ultraintelligent Machine Goodfellow Ian Bengio Yoshua Courville Aaron two thousand sixteen Deep Learning MIT Press. archived original sixteen April two thousand sixteen retrieved twelve November two thousand seventeen Goodman Bryce Flaxman Seth two thousand seventeen.  regulations algorithmic decision making right explanation.  Magazine. thirtyeight three . arXiv 1606. 08813. doi . 1609 aimag. v38i3. 2741. S2CID seven million three hundred seventythree thousand nine hundred fiftynine. Government Accountability Office thirteen September two thousand twentytwo. Consumer Data Increasing Use Poses Risks Privacy. gao. gov Report. Grant Nico Hill Kashmir twentytwo May two thousand twentythree. Google Photo App Still Can Find Gorillas. And Neither Can Apple. The New York Times. Goswami Rohan five April two thousand twentythree. Here A. I. jobs. CNBC. Archived original nineteen June two thousand twentythree. Retrieved nineteen June two thousand twentythree. Harari Yuval Noah October two thousand eighteen. Why Technology Favors Tyranny. The Atlantic. Archived original twentyfive September two thousand twentyone. Retrieved twentythree September two thousand twentyone. Harari Yuval Noah two thousand twentythree.  future humanity. YouTube. Haugeland John one thousand nine hundred eightyfive. Artificial Intelligence The Very Idea. Cambridge Mass. MIT Press. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight zero two hundred sixtytwo eight thousand one hundred fiftythree five. Henderson Mark twentyfour April two thousand seven. Human rights robots  getting carried away. The Times Online. London. Archived original thirtyone May two thousand fourteen. Retrieved thirtyone May two thousand fourteen. Hinton G. Deng L.  D. Dahl G. Mohamed A. Jaitly N. Senior A. Vanhoucke V. Nguyen P. Sainath T. Kingsbury B. two thousand twelve. Deep Neural Networks Acoustic Modeling Speech Recognition The shared views four research groups. IEEE Signal Processing Magazine. twentynine six 8297. Bibcode 2012ISPM... ... 82H. doi . 1109 msp. 2012. 2205597. S2CID two hundred six million four hundred eightyfive thousand nine hundred fortythree. Holley Peter twentyeight January two thousand fifteen. Bill Gates dangers artificial intelligence I understand people concerned. The Washington Post. ISSN one hundred ninety eight thousand two hundred eightysix. Archived original thirty October two thousand fifteen. Retrieved thirty October two thousand fifteen. Hornik Kurt Stinchcombe Maxwell White Halbert one thousand nine hundred eightynine. Multilayer Feedforward Networks Universal Approximators PDF. Neural Networks. Vol. . Pergamon Press. . 359366. Horst Steven two thousand five. The Computational Theory Mind. The Stanford Encyclopedia Philosophy. Archived original six March two thousand sixteen. Retrieved seven March two thousand sixteen. Howe J. November one thousand nine hundred ninetyfour. Artificial Intelligence Edinburgh University Perspective. Archived original fifteen May two thousand seven. Retrieved thirty August two thousand seven. IGM Chicago thirty June two thousand seventeen. Robots Artificial Intelligence. www. igmchicago. org. Archived original one May two thousand nineteen. Retrieved three July two thousand nineteen. Iphofen Ron Kritikos Mihalis three January two thousand nineteen. Regulating artificial intelligence robotics ethics design digital society. Contemporary Social Science. sixteen two 170184. doi . 1080 21582041. 2018. 1563803. ISSN two thousand one hundred fiftyeight two thousand fortyone. S2CID fiftynine million two hundred ninetyeight thousand five hundred two. Jordan M. I. Mitchell T. M. sixteen July two thousand fifteen. Machine learning Trends perspectives prospects. Science. three hundred fortynine six thousand two hundred fortyfive 255260. Bibcode 2015Sci... 349.. 255J. doi . 1126 science. aaa8415. PMID twentysix million one hundred eightyfive thousand two hundred fortythree. S2CID six hundred seventyseven thousand two hundred eighteen. Kahneman Daniel two thousand eleven. Thinking Fast Slow. Macmillan. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight one four thousand two hundred ninetynine six thousand nine hundred thirtyfive two. Archived original fifteen March two thousand twentythree. Retrieved eight April two thousand twelve. Kahneman Daniel Slovic D. Tversky Amos one thousand nine hundred eightytwo. Judgment uncertainty Heuristics biases. Science. one hundred eightyfive four thousand one hundred fiftyseven. New York Cambridge University Press 11241131. Bibcode 1974Sci... 185. 1124T. doi . 1126 science. 185. 4157. 1124. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight zero five hundred twentyone twentyeight thousand four hundred fourteen one. PMID seventeen million eight hundred thirtyfive thousand four hundred fiftyseven. S2CID one hundred fortythree million four hundred fiftytwo thousand nine hundred fiftyseven. Kasperowicz Peter one May two thousand twentythree. Regulate  GOP much skeptical Dems government right poll. Fox News. Archived original nineteen June two thousand twentythree. Retrieved nineteen June two thousand twentythree. Katz Yarden one November two thousand twelve. Noam Chomsky Where Artificial Intelligence Went Wrong. The Atlantic. Archived original twentyeight February two thousand nineteen. Retrieved twentysix October two thousand fourteen. Kismet. MIT Artificial Intelligence Laboratory Humanoid Robotics Group. Archived original seventeen October two thousand fourteen. Retrieved twentyfive October two thousand fourteen. Kissinger Henry one November two thousand twentyone. The Challenge Being Human Age . The Wall Street Journal. Archived original four November two thousand twentyone. Retrieved four November two thousand twentyone. Kobielus James twentyseven November two thousand nineteen. GPUs Continue Dominate  Accelerator Market Now. InformationWeek. Archived original nineteen October two thousand twentyone. Retrieved eleven June two thousand twenty. Kuperman G. J. Reichley R. M. Bailey T. C. one July two thousand six. Using Commercial Knowledge Bases Clinical Decision Support Opportunities Hurdles Recommendations. Journal American Medical Informatics Association. thirteen four 369371. doi . 1197 jamia. M2055. PMC one million five hundred thirteen thousand six hundred eightyone. PMID sixteen million six hundred twentytwo thousand one hundred sixty. Kurzweil Ray two thousand five. The Singularity Near. Penguin Books. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight zero six hundred seventy three thousand three hundred eightyfour three. Langley Pat two thousand eleven. The changing science machine learning. Machine Learning. eightytwo three 275279. doi . 1007 s10994 eleven five thousand two hundred fortytwo. Larson Jeff Angwin Julia twentythree May two thousand sixteen. How  Analyzed COMPAS Recidivism Algorithm. ProPublica. Archived original twentynine April two thousand nineteen. Retrieved nineteen June two thousand twenty. Laskowski Nicole November two thousand twentythree. What Artificial Intelligence How Does  Work TechTarget. Enterprise . Retrieved thirty October two thousand twentythree. Law Library Congress YOU. S.. Global Legal Research Directorate issuing body. two thousand nineteen. Regulation artificial intelligence selected jurisdictions. LCCN two billion nineteen million six hundred sixtyeight thousand one hundred fortythree. OCLC one billion one hundred ten million seven hundred twentyseven thousand eight hundred eight. Lee Timothy B. twentytwo August two thousand fourteen. Will artificial intelligence destroy humanity Here five reasons worry. Vox. Archived original thirty October two thousand fifteen. Retrieved thirty October two thousand fifteen. Lenat Douglas Guha R. V. one thousand nine hundred eightynine. Building Large Knowledge Based Systems. Addison Wesley. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight zero two hundred one fiftyone thousand seven hundred fiftytwo one. Lighthill James one thousand nine hundred seventythree. Artificial Intelligence A General Survey. Artificial Intelligence paper symposium. Science Research Council. Lipartito Kenneth six January two thousand eleven The Narrative Algorithm Genres Credit Reporting Nineteenth Century Today PDF Unpublished manuscript doi . 2139 ssrn. 1736283 S2CID one hundred sixtysix million seven hundred fortytwo thousand nine hundred twentyseven archived PDF original nine October two thousand twentytwo Lohr Steve two thousand seventeen. Robots Will Take Jobs Not Fast Some Fear New Report Says. The New York Times. Archived original fourteen January two thousand eighteen. Retrieved thirteen January two thousand eighteen. Lungarella M. Metta G. Pfeifer R. Sandini G. two thousand three. Developmental robotics survey. Connection Science. fifteen four 151190. CiteSeerX . . . . 7615. doi . 1080 nine quintillion five hundred forty quadrillion ninety trillion three hundred ten billion one million six hundred fiftyfive thousand one hundred ten. S2CID one million four hundred fiftytwo thousand seven hundred thirtyfour. Machine Ethics. aaai. org. Archived original twentynine November 2014. Madrigal Alexis C. twentyseven February two thousand fifteen. The case killer robots guy actually working artificial intelligence. Fusion. net. Archived original four February two thousand sixteen. Retrieved thirtyone January two thousand sixteen. Mahdawi Arwa twentysix June two thousand seventeen. What jobs still around twenty years Read prepare future. The Guardian. Archived original fourteen January two thousand eighteen. Retrieved thirteen January two thousand eighteen. Maker Meg Houston two thousand six.  fifty  Past Present Future. Dartmouth College. Archived original three January two thousand seven. Retrieved sixteen October two thousand eight. Marmouyet Francoise fifteen December two thousand twentythree. Google Gemini new  model really better ChatGPT. The Conversation. Retrieved twentyfive December two thousand twentythree. Minsky Marvin one thousand nine hundred eightysix The Society Mind Simon Schuster Maschafilm two thousand ten. Content Plug Pray Film Artificial Intelligence Robots. plugandpray film. de. Archived original twelve February 2016. McCarthy John Minsky Marvin Rochester Nathan Shannon Claude one thousand nine hundred fiftyfive. A Proposal Dartmouth Summer Research Project Artificial Intelligence. Archived original twentysix August two thousand seven. Retrieved thirty August two thousand seven. McCarthy John two thousand seven From Here Human Level  Artificial Intelligence one hundred seventyone McCarthy John one thousand nine hundred ninetynine What  archived original four December two thousand twentytwo retrieved four December two thousand twentytwo McCauley Lee two thousand seven.  armageddon three laws robotics. Ethics Information Technology. nine two 153164. CiteSeerX . . . . 8904. doi . 1007 s10676 seven nine thousand one hundred thirtyeight two. S2CID thirtyseven million two hundred seventytwo thousand nine hundred fortynine. McGarry Ken one December two thousand five. A survey interestingness measures knowledge discovery. The Knowledge Engineering Review. twenty one 3961. doi . 1017 S0269888905000408. S2CID fourteen million nine hundred eightyseven thousand six hundred fiftysix. McGaughey E two thousand twentytwo Will Robots Automate Your Job Away Full Employment Basic Income Economic Democracy p. fiftyone three Industrial Law Journal five hundred eleven thousand five hundred fiftynine doi . 2139 ssrn. 3044448 S2CID two hundred nineteen million three hundred thirtysix thousand four hundred thirtynine SSRN three million fortyfour thousand four hundred fortyeight archived original thirtyone January two thousand twentyone retrieved twentyseven May two thousand twentythree Merkle Daniel Middendorf Martin two thousand thirteen. Swarm Intelligence.  Burke Edmund K. Kendall Graham eds.. Search Methodologies Introductory Tutorials Optimization Decision Support Techniques. Springer Science Business Media. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight one four thousand six hundred fourteen six thousand nine hundred forty seven. Minsky Marvin one thousand nine hundred sixtyseven Computation Finite Infinite Machines Englewood Cliffs N. J. Prentice Hall Moravec Hans one thousand nine hundred eightyeight. Mind Children. Harvard University Press. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight zero six hundred seventyfour fiftyseven thousand six hundred sixteen two. Archived original twentysix July two thousand twenty. Retrieved eighteen November two thousand nineteen. Morgenstern Michael nine May two thousand fifteen. Automation anxiety. The Economist. Archived original twelve January two thousand eighteen. Retrieved thirteen January two thousand eighteen. Muller Vincent C. Bostrom Nick two thousand fourteen. Future Progress Artificial Intelligence A Poll Among Experts PDF.  Matters. one one 911. doi . 1145 2639475. 2639478. S2CID eight million five hundred ten thousand sixteen. Archived PDF original fifteen January 2016. Neumann Bernd Moller Ralf January two thousand eight.  scene interpretation description logics. Image Vision Computing. twentysix one 82101. doi . 1016 j. imavis. 2007. . 013. S2CID ten million seven hundred sixtyseven thousand eleven. Nilsson Nils one thousand nine hundred ninetyfive Eyes Prize  Magazine vol. sixteen . nine hundred seventeen Newell Allen Simon H. A. one thousand nine hundred seventysix. Computer Science Empirical Inquiry Symbols Search. Communications ACM. nineteen three 113126. doi . 1145 360018. 360022. Nicas Jack seven February two thousand eighteen. How YouTube Drives People Internet Darkest Corners. The Wall Street Journal. ISSN ninetynine nine thousand six hundred sixty. Retrieved sixteen June two thousand eighteen. Nilsson Nils one thousand nine hundred eightythree. Artificial Intelligence Prepares two thousand one PDF.  Magazine. one one. Archived PDF original seventeen August two thousand twenty. Retrieved twentytwo August two thousand twenty. Presidential Address Association Advancement Artificial Intelligence. NRC United States National Research Council one thousand nine hundred ninetynine. Developments Artificial Intelligence. Funding Revolution Government Support Computing Research. National Academy Press. Omohundro Steve two thousand eight. The Nature Self Improving Artificial Intelligence. presented distributed two thousand seven Singularity Summit San Francisco . Oudeyer P Y. two thousand ten.  impact robotics behavioral cognitive sciences insect navigation human cognitive development PDF. IEEE Transactions Autonomous Mental Development. two one 216. doi . 1109 tamd. 2009. 2039057. S2CID six million three hundred sixtytwo thousand two hundred seventeen. Archived PDF original three October two thousand eighteen. Retrieved four June two thousand thirteen. Pennachin C. Goertzel B. two thousand seven. Contemporary Approaches Artificial General Intelligence. Artificial General Intelligence. Cognitive Technologies. Berlin Heidelberg Springer. . 130. doi . 1007 nine hundred seventyeight three five hundred forty sixtyeight thousand six hundred seventyseven four one. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight three five hundred forty twentythree thousand seven hundred thirtythree four. Pinker Steven two thousand seven one thousand nine hundred ninetyfour The Language Instinct Perennial Modern Classics Harper ISBN nine hundred seventyeight zero six one hundred thirtythree thousand six hundred fortysix one Poria Soujanya Cambria Erik Bajpai Rajiv Hussain Amir September two thousand seventeen. A review affective computing From unimodal analysis multimodal fusion. Information Fusion. thirtyseven 98125. doi . 1016 j. inffus. 2017. . 003. hdl one thousand eight hundred ninetythree twentyfive thousand four hundred ninety. S2CID two hundred five million four hundred thirtythree thousand fortyone. Archived original twentythree March two thousand twentythree. Retrieved twentyseven April two thousand twentyone. Rawlinson Kevin twentynine January two thousand fifteen. Microsoft Bill Gates insists  threat. BBC News. Archived original twentynine January two thousand fifteen. Retrieved thirty January two thousand fifteen. Reisner Alex nineteen August two thousand twentythree Revealed The Authors Whose Pirated Books Powering Generative  The Atlantic Roberts Jacob two thousand sixteen. Thinking Machines The Search Artificial Intelligence. Distillations. Vol. two. . . 1423. Archived original nineteen August two thousand eighteen. Retrieved twenty March two thousand eighteen. Robitzski Dan five September two thousand eighteen. Five experts share scares . Archived original eight December two thousand nineteen. Retrieved eight December two thousand nineteen. Robots could demand legal rights. BBC News. twentyone December 2006. Archived original fifteen October two thousand nineteen. Retrieved three February two thousand eleven. Rose Steve eleven July two thousand twentythree.  Utopia dystopia. The Guardian Weekly. . 4243. Russell Stuart two thousand nineteen. Human Compatible Artificial Intelligence Problem Control. United States Viking. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight zero five hundred twentyfive fiftyfive thousand eight hundred sixtyone three. OCLC one billion eightythree million six hundred ninetyfour thousand three hundred twentytwo. Sainato Michael nineteen August two thousand fifteen. Stephen Hawking Elon Musk Bill Gates Warn About Artificial Intelligence. Observer. Archived original thirty October two thousand fifteen. Retrieved thirty October two thousand fifteen. Sample Ian five November two thousand seventeen. Computer says making AIs fair accountable transparent crucial. The Guardian. Retrieved thirty January two thousand eighteen. Rothman Denis seven October two thousand twenty. Exploring LIME Explanations Mathematics Behind . Codemotion. Retrieved twentyfive November two thousand twentythree. Scassellati Brian two thousand two. Theory mind humanoid robot. Autonomous Robots. twelve one 1324. doi . 1023 A one trillion thirteen billion two hundred ninetyeight million five hundred seven thousand one hundred fourteen. S2CID one million nine hundred seventynine thousand three hundred fifteen. Schmidhuber J. two thousand fifteen. Deep Learning Neural Networks  Overview. Neural Networks. sixtyone 85117. arXiv 1404. 7828. doi . 1016 j. neunet. 2014. . 003. PMID twentyfive million four hundred sixtytwo thousand six hundred thirtyseven. S2CID eleven million seven hundred fifteen thousand five hundred nine. Schmidhuber Jurgen two thousand twentytwo. Annotated History Modern  Deep Learning. Schulz Hannes Behnke Sven one November two thousand twelve. Deep Learning.  Kunstliche Intelligenz. twentysix four 357363. doi . 1007 s13218 twelve one hundred ninetyeight z. ISSN one thousand six hundred ten one thousand nine hundred eightyseven. S2CID two hundred twenty million five hundred twentythree thousand five hundred sixtytwo. Searle John one thousand nine hundred eighty. Minds Brains Programs PDF. Behavioral Brain Sciences. three three 417457. doi . 1017 S0140525X00005756. S2CID fiftyfive million three hundred three thousand seven hundred twentyone. Archived PDF original seventeen March two thousand nineteen. Retrieved twentytwo August two thousand twenty. Searle John one thousand nine hundred ninetynine. Mind language society. New York Basic Books. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight zero four hundred sixtyfive four thousand five hundred twentyone one. OCLC two hundred thirtyone million eight hundred sixtyseven thousand six hundred sixtyfive. Archived original twentysix July two thousand twenty. Retrieved twentytwo August two thousand twenty. Simon H. A. one thousand nine hundred sixtyfive The Shape Automation Men Management New York Harper Row Simonite Tom thirtyone March two thousand sixteen. How Google Plans Solve Artificial Intelligence. MIT Technology Review. Smith Craig S. fifteen March two thousand twentythree. ChatGPT four Creator Ilya Sutskever  Hallucinations  Democracy. Forbes. Retrieved twentyfive December two thousand twentythree. Smoliar Stephen W. Zhang HongJiang one thousand nine hundred ninetyfour. Content based video indexing retrieval. IEEE MultiMedia. one two 6272. doi . 1109 . 311653. S2CID thirtytwo million seven hundred ten thousand nine hundred thirteen. Solomonoff Ray one thousand nine hundred fiftysix.  Inductive Inference Machine PDF. Dartmouth Summer Research Conference Artificial Intelligence. Archived PDF original twentysix April two thousand eleven. Retrieved twentytwo March two thousand eleven via std. com pdf scanned copy original. Later published Solomonoff Ray one thousand nine hundred fiftyseven.  Inductive Inference Machine. IRE Convention Record. Vol. Section Information Theory part . . 5662. Stanford University two thousand twentythree. Artificial Intelligence Index Report two thousand twentythree Chapter six Policy Governance PDF.  Index. Archived PDF original nineteen June two thousand twentythree. Retrieved nineteen June two thousand twentythree. Tao Jianhua Tan Tieniu two thousand five. Affective Computing Intelligent Interaction. Affective Computing A Review. Lecture Notes Computer Science. Vol. 3784. Springer. . 981995. doi . 1007 eleven million five hundred seventythree thousand five hundred fortyeight. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight three five hundred forty twentynine thousand six hundred twentyone eight. Taylor Josh Hern Alex two May two thousand twentythree. Godfather  Geoffrey Hinton quits Google warns dangers misinformation. The Guardian. Thompson Derek twentythree January two thousand fourteen. What Jobs Will Robots Take. The Atlantic. Archived original twentyfour April two thousand eighteen. Retrieved twentyfour April two thousand eighteen. Thro Ellen one thousand nine hundred ninetythree. Robotics The Marriage Computers Machines. New York Facts File. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight zero eight thousand one hundred sixty two thousand six hundred twentyeight nine. Archived original twentysix July two thousand twenty. Retrieved twentytwo August two thousand twenty. Toews Rob three September two thousand twentythree. Transformers Revolutionized . What Will Replace Them. Forbes. Retrieved eight December two thousand twentythree. Turing Alan October one thousand nine hundred fifty Computing Machinery Intelligence Mind LIX two hundred thirtysix four hundred thirtythree thousand four hundred sixty doi . 1093 mind LIX. 236. 433 ISSN twentysix four thousand four hundred twentythree UNESCO Science Report Race Against Time Smarter Development. Paris UNESCO. 2021. ISBN nine hundred seventyeight ninetytwo three one hundred thousand four hundred fifty six. Archived original eighteen June two thousand twentytwo. Retrieved eighteen September two thousand twentyone. Urbina Fabio Lentzos Filippa Invernizzi Cedric Ekins Sean seven March two thousand twentytwo. Dual use artificial intelligence powered drug discovery. Nature Machine Intelligence. four three 189191. doi . 1038 s42256 twentytwo four hundred sixtyfive nine. PMC nine million five hundred fortyfour thousand two hundred eighty. PMID thirtysix million two hundred eleven thousand one hundred thirtythree. S2CID two hundred fortyseven million three hundred two thousand three hundred ninetyone. Valance Christ thirty May two thousand twentythree. Artificial intelligence could lead extinction experts warn. BBC News. Archived original seventeen June two thousand twentythree. Retrieved eighteen June two thousand twentythree. Valinsky Jordan eleven April two thousand nineteen Amazon reportedly employs thousands people listen Alexa conversations CNN. com Verma Yugesh twentyfive December two thousand twentyone. A Complete Guide SHAP SHAPley Additive exPlanations Practitioners. Analytics India Magazine. Retrieved twentyfive November two thousand twentythree. Vincent James seven November two thousand nineteen. OpenAI published text generating  said dangerous share. The Verge. Archived original eleven June two thousand twenty. Retrieved eleven June two thousand twenty. Vincent James fifteen November two thousand twentytwo. The scary truth  copyright nobody knows happen next. The Verge. Archived original nineteen June two thousand twentythree. Retrieved nineteen June two thousand twentythree. Vincent James three April two thousand twentythree.  entering era corporate control. The Verge. Archived original nineteen June two thousand twentythree. Retrieved nineteen June two thousand twentythree. Vinge Vernor one thousand nine hundred ninetythree. The Coming Technological Singularity How Survive Post Human Era. Vision twentyone Interdisciplinary Science Engineering Era Cyberspace . Bibcode 1993vise. nasa... 11V. Archived original one January two thousand seven. Retrieved fourteen November two thousand eleven. Waddell Kaveh two thousand eighteen. Chatbots Have Entered Uncanny Valley. The Atlantic. Archived original twentyfour April two thousand eighteen. Retrieved twentyfour April two thousand eighteen. Wallach Wendell two thousand ten. Moral Machines. Oxford University Press. Wason P. C. Shapiro D. one thousand nine hundred sixtysix. Reasoning.  Foss B. M. .. New horizons psychology. Harmondsworth Penguin. Archived original twentysix July two thousand twenty. Retrieved eighteen November two thousand nineteen. Weng J. McClelland Pentland A. Sporns O. Stockman I. Sur M. Thelen E. two thousand one. Autonomous mental development robots animals PDF. Science. two hundred ninetyone five thousand five hundred four 599600. doi . 1126 science. 291. 5504. 599. PMID eleven million two hundred twentynine thousand four hundred two. S2CID fiftyfour million one hundred thirtyone thousand seven hundred ninetyseven. Archived PDF original four September two thousand thirteen. Retrieved four June two thousand thirteen via msu. edu. What fuzzy logic Are computers inherently fuzzy apply usual binary logic. Scientific American. twentyone October 1999. Archived original six May two thousand eighteen. Retrieved five May two thousand eighteen. Williams Rhiannon twentyeight June two thousand twentythree Humans may likely believe disinformation generated  MIT Technology Review Wirtz Bernd W. Weyerer Jan C. Geyer Carolin twentyfour July two thousand eighteen. Artificial Intelligence Public Sector Applications Challenges. International Journal Public Administration. fortytwo seven 596615. doi . 1080 01900692. 2018. 1498103. ISSN one hundred ninety six hundred ninetytwo. S2CID one hundred fiftyeight million eight hundred twentynine thousand six hundred two. Archived original eighteen August two thousand twenty. Retrieved twentytwo August two thousand twenty. Wong Matteo nineteen May two thousand twentythree ChatGPT  Already Obsolete The Atlantic Yudkowsky E two thousand eight Artificial Intelligence Positive Negative Factor Global Risk PDF Global Catastrophic Risks Oxford University Press two thousand eight Bibcode 2008gcr.. book.. 303Y archived PDF original nineteen October two thousand thirteen retrieved twentyfour September two thousand twentyone Further reading Ashish Vaswani Noam Shazeer Niki Parmar  al. Attention need. Advances neural information processing systems thirty two thousand seventeen. Seminal paper transformers. Autor David H. Why Are There Still  Many Jobs The History Future Workplace Automation two thousand fifteen twentynine three Journal Economic Perspectives . Boden Margaret Mind As Machine Oxford University Press 2006. Cukier Kenneth Ready Robots How Think Future  Foreign Affairs vol. ninetyeight. four July August two thousand nineteen . 19298. George Dyson historian computing writes might called Dyson Law Any system simple enough understandable complicated enough behave intelligently system complicated enough behave intelligently complicated understand. p. 197. Computer scientist Alex Pentland writes Current  machine learning algorithms core dead simple stupid. They work work brute force. p. 198. Gertner Jon. two thousand twentythree Wikipedia Moment Truth Can online encyclopedia help teach A. I. chatbots get facts right without destroying process New York Times Magazine July eighteen two thousand twentythree online Gleick James The Fate Free Will review Kevin J. Mitchell Free Agents How Evolution Gave  Free Will Princeton University Press two thousand twentythree three hundred thirtythree . The New York Review Books vol. LXXI. one eighteen January two thousand twentyfour . two thousand seven hundred twentyeight . Agency distinguishes us machines. For biological creatures reason purpose come acting world experiencing consequences. Artificial intelligences disembodied strangers blood sweat tears occasion. p. . Hughes Castleberry Kenna A Murder Mystery Puzzle The literary puzzle Cain Jawbone stumped humans decades reveals limitations natural language processing algorithms Scientific American vol. three hundred twentynine. four November two thousand twentythree . 8182. This murder mystery competition revealed although NLP natural language processing models capable incredible feats abilities much limited amount context receive. This... could cause difficulties researchers hope use things analyze ancient languages.  cases historical records long gone civilizations serve training data purpose. p. . Immerwahr Daniel Your Lying Eyes People use A. I. generate fake videos indistinguishable real ones. How much matter The New Yorker twenty November two thousand twentythree . 5459.  deepfakes mean realistic videos produced using artificial intelligence actually deceive people barely exist. The fakes deep deeps fake.... A. I. generated videos general operating media counterfeited evidence. Their role better resembles cartoons especially smutty ones. p. . Johnston John two thousand eight The Allure Machinic Life Cybernetics Artificial Life New  MIT Press. Jumper John Evans Richard Pritzel Alexander  al. twentysix August two thousand twentyone. Highly accurate protein structure prediction AlphaFold. Nature. five hundred ninetysix seven thousand eight hundred seventythree 583589. Bibcode 2021Natur. 596.. 583J. doi . 1038 s41586 twentyone three thousand eight hundred nineteen two. PMC eight million three hundred seventyone thousand six hundred five. PMID thirtyfour million two hundred sixtyfive thousand eight hundred fortyfour. S2CID two hundred thirtyfive million nine hundred fiftynine thousand eight hundred sixtyseven. LeCun Yann Bengio Yoshua Hinton Geoffrey twentyeight May two thousand fifteen. Deep learning. Nature. five hundred twentyone seven thousand five hundred fiftythree 436444. Bibcode 2015Natur. 521.. 436L. doi . 1038 nature14539. PMID twentysix million seventeen thousand four hundred fortytwo. S2CID three million seventyfour thousand ninetysix. Archived original five June two thousand twentythree. Retrieved nineteen June two thousand twentythree. Marcus Gary Artificial Confidence Even newest buzziest systems artificial general intelligence stymmied old problems Scientific American vol. three hundred twentyseven. four October two thousand twentytwo . 4245. Mitchell Melanie two thousand nineteen. Artificial intelligence guide thinking humans. New York Farrar Straus Giroux. ISBN nine trillion seven hundred eighty billion three hundred seventyfour million two hundred fiftyseven thousand eight hundred thirtyfive. Mnih Volodymyr Kavukcuoglu Koray Silver David  al. twentysix February two thousand fifteen. Human level control deep reinforcement learning. Nature. five hundred eighteen seven thousand five hundred forty 529533. Bibcode 2015Natur. 518.. 529M. doi . 1038 nature14236. PMID twentyfive million seven hundred nineteen thousand six hundred seventy. S2CID two hundred five million two hundred fortytwo thousand seven hundred forty. Archived original nineteen June two thousand twentythree. Retrieved nineteen June two thousand twentythree. Introduced DQN produced human level performance Atari games. Press Eyal  Front Their Faces Does facial recognition technology lead police ignore contradictory evidence The New Yorker twenty November two thousand twentythree . 2026. Roivainen Eka   ChatGPT aced standard intelligence test showed intelligence measured  alone Scientific American vol. three hundred twentynine. one July August two thousand twentythree p. . Despite high  ChatGPT fails tasks require real humanlike reasoning understanding physical social world.... ChatGPT seemed unable reason logically tried rely vast database... facts derived online texts. Scharre Paul Killer Apps The Real Dangers  Arms Race Foreign Affairs vol. ninetyeight. three May June two thousand nineteen . 13544. Today  technologies powerful unreliable. Rules based systems deal circumstances programmers anticipate. Learning systems limited data trained.  failures already led tragedy. Advanced autopilot features cars although perform well circumstances driven cars without warning trucks concrete barriers parked cars.  wrong situation  systems go supersmart superdumb instant. When enemy trying manipulate hack  system risks even greater. p. 140. Serenko Alexander Michael Dohan two thousand eleven. Comparing expert survey citation impact journal ranking methods Example field Artificial Intelligence PDF. Journal Informetrics. five four 62949. doi . 1016 j. joi. 2011. . 002. Archived PDF original four October two thousand thirteen. Retrieved twelve September two thousand thirteen. Silver David Huang Aja Maddison Chris J.  al. twentyeight January two thousand sixteen. Mastering game  deep neural networks tree search. Nature. five hundred twentynine seven thousand five hundred eightyseven 484489. Bibcode 2016Natur. 529.. 484S. doi . 1038 nature16961. PMID twentysix million eight hundred nineteen thousand fortytwo. S2CID five hundred fifteen thousand nine hundred twentyfive. Archived original eighteen June two thousand twentythree. Retrieved nineteen June two thousand twentythree. White Paper  Artificial Intelligence A European approach excellence trust PDF. Brussels European Commission. 2020. Archived PDF original twenty February two thousand twenty. Retrieved twenty February two thousand twenty. External links Articles related Artificial intelligence